










































TRUST F B O ALTSCHUL CHARLES U A D 10 22 58 Top Holdings  

































WhaleWisdom









Search All
Search 13F Filers Only
Search SEC Filer
Search Stocks Only
Search Mgmt Inv. Cos Only
ETFs Only
Search Active




















                      TRUST F B O ALTSCHUL CHARLES U A D 10 22 58
                    

•   NEW YORK, NY
                          • Trust
                      
How do I update this listing?




                                             Trust F B O Altschul Charles U A D 10 22 58 is based out of New York.   
                                           














Summary
13D/G
Insider (Form 4)



   Create Email Alert
 




×
Email Notification.







                   ***Log In or
                   Sign-up
                   to see more advanced email alert options such as selecting any type of
                   SEC form, multiple filers or classes of filers, and much more.***
                 

                    ...or to simply have an email sent to you whenever we receive a new
                           13F filing from TRUST F B O ALTSCHUL CHARLES U A D 10 22 58, enter your
                    email address below and choose 'Submit'.
                

Your email:








Cancel














Contact Info




trust f b o altschul charles u a d 10 22 58


OVERBROOK MANAGEMENT CORP

NEW YORK
NY
                                                        
                                                    10168-2500


                                                      Business Phone:
                                                      2126618710







Recent SEC Filings




4 filed on 04/07/2017
4 filed on 03/31/2017
4 filed on 10/12/2016
4 filed on 09/26/2016
4/A filed on 06/29/2016
4 filed on 06/24/2016
4 filed on 05/26/2016
4 filed on 04/29/2016
4 filed on 04/27/2016
4 filed on 07/15/2015
















Schedule 13D and 13G events since 03/31/2017

Subscription required



 
Form 4 - Non-derivative Insider Transactions Since 03/31/2017
Loading...








Elevate your investments
Try it for free



















503 Backend fetch failed


Error 503 Backend fetch failed
Backend fetch failed
Guru Meditation:
XID: 24003824

Varnish cache server

















Food & Beverage Magazine June 2017 by Food & Beverage Magazine - issuu



















































issuu company logo
issuu












            Explore
        






                        Categories
                    


                                Arts & Entertainment
                            



                                Style & Fashion
                            



                                Home & Garden
                            



                                Business
                            



                                Travel
                            



                                Education
                            



                                See all categories
                                







                        Collections
                    


                                Top Picks
                            



                                Generators
                            



                                Hygge
                            



                                Feminism
                            



                                Zines
                            



                                Makers
                            






                        Find More
                    


                                Plans & Pricing
                            



                                Community
                            



                                Help & Support
                            



                                About issuu
                            









            Publisher Plans
        




















Close







                        Categories
                    


                                Arts & Entertainment
                            



                                Style & Fashion
                            



                                Home & Garden
                            



                                Business
                            



                                Travel
                            



                                Education
                            



                                See all categories
                                







                        Collections
                    


                                Top Picks
                            



                                Generators
                            



                                Hygge
                            



                                Feminism
                            



                                Zines
                            



                                Makers
                            






                        Find More
                    


                                Plans & Pricing
                            



                                Community
                            



                                Help & Support
                            



                                About issuu
                            












        Sign up
    

        Sign in
    

        Sign in
    




InfoSaveLikeShareDownloadMoreFood & Beverage Magazine June 2017  Published on Jun 1, 2017  On The Cover: CHEF JOHN TESAR - 
ELEMENT KITCHEN&COCKTAL
INDUSTRY PROFESSIONS: CYNTHIA TORP,  CEO/SOLID LIGHT
RANDALL  GOLDMAN, CEO/PATRICK...See MorefoodandbeveragemagazineFollowRead moreRead moreSimilar toPopular nowJust for youGo explore








John D. Rockefeller - Wikipedia




















 








John D. Rockefeller

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For other people named John D. Rockefeller, see John D. Rockefeller (disambiguation).


John D. Rockefeller



John D. Rockefeller in 1885



Born
John Davison Rockefeller
(1839-07-08)July 8, 1839
Richford, New York, U.S.


Died
May 23, 1937(1937-05-23) (aged 97)
The Casements, Ormond Beach, Florida, U.S.


Resting place
Lake View Cemetery, Cleveland, Ohio, U.S.
41°30′40″N 81°35′28″W﻿ / ﻿41.511°N 81.591°W﻿ / 41.511; -81.591


Occupation
Oil industry business magnate and philanthropist


Known for
Founding and leading the Standard Oil Company
Founding the University of Chicago, Rockefeller University, Central Philippine University, General Education Board and Rockefeller Foundation



Net worth
US$392 billion (in 2016 dollars; inflation-adjusted) in 1913,[a] according to Forbes[1][2]
(1.5% to 2% of the United States economy; or approximately 1/65th to 1/50th of its GDP)[b]


Political party
Republican


Spouse(s)
Laura Celestia Spelman
(m. 1864–1915; her death)


Children
Elizabeth, Alice, Alta, Edith, and John Jr.


Parent(s)



William Avery Rockefeller
Eliza Davison





Relatives
Rockefeller family


John Davison Rockefeller Sr. (July 8, 1839 – May 23, 1937) was an American oil industry business magnate and philanthropist.
Widely considered the wealthiest American of all time[4][5] and the richest person in modern history,[6][7] Rockefeller was born into a large family in upstate New York and was shaped by his con man father and religious mother. His family moved several times before eventually settling in Cleveland, Ohio. Rockefeller became an assistant bookkeeper at the age of 16, and went into a business partnership with Maurice B. Clark and his brothers at 20. After buying them out, he and his brother William founded Rockefeller & Andrews with Samuel Andrews. Instead of drilling for oil, he concentrated on refining. In 1867, Henry Flagler entered the partnership. The Rockefeller, Andrews & Flagler company grew by incorporating local refineries. Rockefeller formally founded the Standard Oil Company, Inc. in 1870 as an Ohio partnership with his brother, Henry Flagler, Jabez A. Bostwick, Samuel Andrews and a silent partner, Stephen V. Harkness. He ran it until 1897. As kerosene and gasoline grew in importance, Rockefeller's wealth soared and he became the richest person in the country, controlling 90% of all oil in the United States at his peak.[c] Oil was used throughout the country as a light source until the introduction of electricity and as a fuel after the invention of the automobile. Furthermore, Rockefeller gained enormous influence over the railroad industry, which transported his oil around the country. Standard Oil was the first great business trust in the United States. Rockefeller revolutionized the petroleum industry, and along with other key contemporary industrialists such as steel magnate Andrew Carnegie, defined the structure of modern philanthropy.[8]
The U.S. Supreme Court ruled in 1911 that Standard Oil must be dismantled for violation of federal anti-trust laws. It was broken up into 34 separate entities that included companies that would become ExxonMobil, Chevron and others. Some of them still having the largest revenue, as individual pieces of the company were worth more than the whole and, as shares of these doubled and tripled in value in their early years, Rockefeller became the country's first billionaire with a fortune worth nearly 2 percent of the national economy.[3] His peak net worth was estimated at $336 billion (in 2007 USD, inflation-adjusted) in 1913.[9][10][d] Rockefeller spent the last 40 years of his life in retirement at his estate in Westchester County, New York. His fortune was mainly used to create the modern systematic approach of targeted philanthropy through the creation of foundations that had a major effect on medicine, education and scientific research.[11] His foundations pioneered the development of medical research and were instrumental in the eradication of hookworm[12] and yellow fever.[13]
Rockefeller was also the founder of both the University of Chicago and Rockefeller University and funded the establishment of Central Philippine University in the Philippines. He was a devout Northern Baptist and supported many church-based institutions. Rockefeller adhered to total abstinence from alcohol and tobacco throughout his life.[14] He was a faithful congregant of the Erie Street Baptist Mission Church, where he taught Sunday school, and served as a trustee, clerk and occasional janitor.[15][16] Religion was a guiding force throughout his life and Rockefeller believed it to be the source of his success. Rockefeller was also considered a supporter of capitalism based on a perspective of social Darwinism and was quoted often as saying: "The growth of a large business is merely a survival of the fittest".[17][18]



Contents


1 Early life
2 Pre-Standard Oil career

2.1 As a bookkeeper
2.2 Business partnership and Civil War service
2.3 Beginning in the oil business


3 Standard Oil

3.1 Founding and early growth
3.2 Monopoly


4 Colorado Fuel and Iron

4.1 Strike of 1913–14 and the Ludlow Massacre


5 Illnesses and death
6 Personal life

6.1 Family
6.2 Marriage
6.3 Religious views
6.4 Rumors


7 Philanthropy
8 Florida home
9 Legacy
10 See also
11 Notes
12 References
13 Bibliography
14 External links



Early life




Rockefeller's birthplace in Richford, New York


Rockefeller was the second of six children and eldest son born in Richford, New York to con artist William Avery "Bill" Rockefeller (November 13, 1810 – May 11, 1906) and Eliza Davison (September 12, 1813 – March 28, 1889). His siblings were Lucy (1838–1878), William Jr. (1841–1922), Mary (1843–1925) and twins Franklin (Frank) (1845–1917) and Frances (1845–1847). His father was of English and German descent while his mother was of Scots-Irish descent. Bill was first a lumberman and then a traveling salesman who identified himself as a "botanic physician" and sold elixirs. The locals referred to the mysterious but fun-loving man as "Big Bill" and "Devil Bill".[19] He was a sworn foe of conventional morality who had opted for a vagabond existence and who returned to his family infrequently. Throughout his life, Bill was notorious for shady schemes.[20] In between the births of Lucy and John, Bill and his mistress/housekeeper Nancy Brown had a daughter named Clorinda who died young. Between John and William Jr.'s births, Bill and Nancy had another daughter, Cornelia.[21]
Eliza, a homemaker and a devout Baptist, struggled to maintain a semblance of stability at home, as Bill was frequently gone for extended periods. She also put up with his philandering and his double life, which included bigamy.[22] Thrifty by nature and necessity, she taught her son that "willful waste makes woeful want".[23] John did his share of the regular household chores and earned extra money raising turkeys, selling potatoes and candy, and eventually lending small sums of money to neighbors. He followed his father's advice to "trade dishes for platters" and always get the better part of any deal. Bill once bragged, "I cheat my boys every chance I get. I want to make 'em sharp."[24]


“
From the beginning, I was trained to work, to save, and to give."
”


— John D. Rockefeller, [25]


When he was a boy, his family moved to Moravia, New York, and in 1851 to Owego, New York, where he attended Owego Academy. In 1853, his family moved to Strongsville, Ohio and he attended Cleveland's Central High School, the first high school in Cleveland and the first free, public high school west of the Alleghenies. Then, he took a ten-week business course at Folsom's Commercial College, where he studied bookkeeping.[26] Despite his father's absences and frequent family moves, young John was a well-behaved, serious, and studious boy. His contemporaries described him as reserved, earnest, religious, methodical, and discreet. He was an excellent debater and expressed himself precisely. He also had a deep love of music and dreamed of it as a possible career.[27]
Pre-Standard Oil career
As a bookkeeper




Rockefeller at age 18, ca. 1856-1857


In September 1855, when Rockefeller was sixteen, he got his first job as an assistant bookkeeper working for a small produce commission firm called Hewitt & Tuttle. He worked long hours and delighted, as he later recalled, in "all the methods and systems of the office."[28] He was particularly adept at calculating transportation costs, which served him well later in his career. Making 50 cents a day, the full salary for his first three months' work was $50 (equivalent to $1 thousand[29] in 2016 dollars).[30]
As a youth, Rockefeller reportedly said that his two great ambitions were to make $100,000 (equivalent to $3 million[29] in 2016 dollars) and to live 100 years.[31]
Business partnership and Civil War service
In 1859, Rockefeller went into the produce commission business with a partner, Maurice B. Clark, and they raised $4,000 ($106,622 in 2016 dollars) in capital. Rockefeller went steadily ahead in business from there, making money each year of his career.[32] While his brother Frank fought in the Civil War, Rockefeller tended his business and hired substitute soldiers. He gave money to the Union cause, as did many rich Northerners who avoided combat. Rockefeller was an abolitionist who voted for President Abraham Lincoln and supported the then-new Republican Party.[33] As he said, "God gave me money", and he did not apologize for it. He felt at ease and righteous following Methodist preacher John Wesley's dictum, "gain all you can, save all you can, and give all you can."[34]
At that time, the Federal government was subsidizing oil prices, driving the price up from $.35 a barrel in 1862 to as high as $13.75.[35] This created an oil-drilling glut, with thousands of speculators attempting to make their fortunes. Most failed, but those who struck oil did not even need to be efficient. They would blow holes in the ground and gather up the oil as they could, often leading to creeks and rivers flowing with wasted oil in the place of water.[36]
In this environment of wasteful boom, the partners switched from foodstuffs to oil, building an oil refinery in 1863 in "The Flats", then Cleveland's burgeoning industrial area. The refinery was directly owned by Andrews, Clark & Company, which was composed of Clark & Rockefeller, chemist Samuel Andrews, and M. B. Clark's two brothers. The commercial oil business was then in its infancy. Whale oil had become too expensive for the masses, and a cheaper, general-purpose lighting fuel was needed.[37]
While other refineries would keep the 60% of oil product that became kerosene, but dump the other 40% in rivers and massive sludge piles,[38] Rockefeller remained as thrifty and efficient as ever, using the gasoline to fuel the refinery, and selling the rest as lubricating oil, petroleum jelly and paraffin wax, and other by-products. Tar was used for paving, naphtha shipped to gas plants.[35] Likewise, Rockefeller's refineries hired their own plumbers, cutting the cost of pipe-laying in half. Barrels that cost $2.50 each ended up only $.96 when Rockefeller bought the wood and had them built for himself.[citation needed]
In February 1865, in what was later described by oil industry historian Daniel Yergin as a "critical" action, Rockefeller bought out the Clark brothers for $72,500 (equivalent to $1 million[29] in 2016 dollars) at auction and established the firm of Rockefeller & Andrews. Rockefeller said, "It was the day that determined my career."[39] He was well positioned to take advantage of postwar prosperity and the great expansion westward fostered by the growth of railroads and an oil-fueled economy. He borrowed heavily, reinvested profits, adapted rapidly to changing markets, and fielded observers to track the quickly expanding industry.[40]
Beginning in the oil business
In 1866, William Rockefeller Jr., John's brother, built another refinery in Cleveland and brought John into the partnership. In 1867, Henry M. Flagler became a partner, and the firm of Rockefeller, Andrews & Flagler was established. By 1868, with Rockefeller continuing practices of borrowing and reinvesting profits, controlling costs, and using refineries' waste, the company owned two Cleveland refineries and a marketing subsidiary in New York; it was the largest oil refinery in the world.[41][42] Rockefeller, Andrews & Flagler was the predecessor of the Standard Oil Company.
Standard Oil
Main article: Standard Oil
Founding and early growth




John D. Rockefeller ca. 1875


By the end of the American Civil War, Cleveland was one of the five main refining centers in the U.S. (besides Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, New York, and the region in northwestern Pennsylvania where most of the oil originated). By 1869 there was three times more kerosene refining capacity than needed to supply the market, and the capacity remained in excess for many years.[43]
On 10 January 1870, Rockefeller abolished the partnership of Rockefeller, Andrews & Flagler,[44] forming Standard Oil of Ohio. Continuing to apply his work ethic and efficiency, Rockefeller quickly expanded the company to be the most profitable refiner in Ohio. Likewise, it became one of the largest shippers of oil and kerosene in the country. The railroads competed fiercely for traffic and, in an attempt to create a cartel to control freight rates, formed the South Improvement Company offering special deals to bulk customers like Standard Oil, outside the main oil centers. The cartel offered preferential treatment as a high-volume shipper, which included not just steep discounts/rebates of up to 50% for their product but rebates for the shipment of competing products.[45]
Part of this scheme was the announcement of sharply increased freight charges. This touched off a firestorm of protest from independent oil well owners, including boycotts and vandalism, which led to the discovery of Standard Oil's part in the deal. A major New York refiner, Charles Pratt and Company, headed by Charles Pratt and Henry H. Rogers, led the opposition to this plan, and railroads soon backed off. Pennsylvania revoked the cartel's charter, and non-preferential rates were restored for the time being.[46] While competitors may have been unhappy, Rockefeller's efforts did bring American consumers cheaper kerosene and other oil by-products. Before 1870, oil light was only for the wealthy, provided by expensive whale oil. But during the next decade, kerosene became commonly available to the working and middle classes.[38]
Undeterred, though vilified for the first time by the press, Rockefeller continued with his self-reinforcing cycle of buying the least efficient competing refiners, improving the efficiency of his operations, pressing for discounts on oil shipments, undercutting his competition, making secret deals, raising investment pools, and buying rivals out. In less than four months in 1872, in what was later known as "The Cleveland Conquest" or "The Cleveland Massacre", Standard Oil absorbed 22 of its 26 Cleveland competitors.[47] Eventually, even his former antagonists, Pratt and Rogers, saw the futility of continuing to compete against Standard Oil: in 1874, they made a secret agreement with Rockefeller to be acquired.
Pratt and Rogers became Rockefeller's partners. Rogers, in particular, became one of Rockefeller's key men in the formation of the Standard Oil Trust. Pratt's son, Charles Millard Pratt, became Secretary of Standard Oil. For many of his competitors, Rockefeller had merely to show them his books so they could see what they were up against and make them a decent offer. If they refused his offer, he told them he would run them into bankruptcy and then cheaply buy up their assets at auction. But this was not intended to eliminate competition entirely. In fact, his partner Pratt said of that accusation "Competitors we must have...if we absorb them, it surely will bring up another."[38]
Instead of wanting to eliminate them, Rockefeller saw himself as the industry's savior, "an angel of mercy" absorbing the weak and making the industry as a whole stronger, more efficient, and more competitive.[48] Standard was growing horizontally and vertically. It added its own pipelines, tank cars, and home delivery network. It kept oil prices low to stave off competitors, made its products affordable to the average household, and, to increase market penetration, sometimes sold below cost. It developed over 300 oil-based products from tar to paint to petroleum jelly to chewing gum. By the end of the 1870s, Standard was refining over 90% of the oil in the U.S.[49] Rockefeller had already become a millionaire ($1 million is equivalent to $25 million[29] in 2016 dollars).[50]

"He instinctively realized that orderliness would only proceed from centralized control of large aggregations of plant and capital, with the one aim of an orderly flow of products from the producer to the consumer. That orderly, economic, efficient flow is what we now, many years later, call 'vertical integration' I do not know whether Mr. Rockefeller ever used the word 'integration'. I only know he conceived the idea." A Standard Oil of Ohio successor of Rockefeller [43]





Standard Oil Trust Certificate 1896


In 1877, Standard clashed with Thomas A. Scott, the president of the Pennsylvania Railroad, Standard's chief hauler. Rockefeller envisioned pipelines as an alternative transport system for oil and began a campaign to build and acquire them.[51] The railroad, seeing Standard's incursion into the transportation and pipeline fields, struck back and formed a subsidiary to buy and build oil refineries and pipelines.[52]
Standard countered and held back its shipments and, with the help of other railroads, started a price war that dramatically reduced freight payments and caused labor unrest. Rockefeller prevailed and the railroad sold its oil interests to Standard. But in the aftermath of that battle, in 1879 the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania indicted Rockefeller on charges of monopolizing the oil trade, starting an avalanche of similar court proceedings in other states and making a national issue of Standard Oil's business practices.[53] Rockefeller was under great strain during the 1870s and 1880s when he was carrying out his plan of consolidation and integration and being attacked by the press. He complained that he could not stay asleep most nights. Rockefeller later commented:[43]

"All the fortune that I have made has not served to compensate me for the anxiety of that period."

Monopoly




Puck magazine cartoon, "The Infant Hercules and the Standard Oil serpents", May 23, 1906 issue; depicting U.S. President Theodore Roosevelt grabbing the head of Nelson W. Aldrich and the snake-like body of John D. Rockefeller.


Although it always had hundreds of competitors, Standard Oil gradually gained dominance of oil refining and sales as market share in the United States through horizontal integration, ending up with about 90% of the US market.[35] In the kerosene industry, the company replaced the old distribution system with its own vertical system. It supplied kerosene by tank cars that brought the fuel to local markets, and tank wagons then delivered to retail customers, thus bypassing the existing network of wholesale jobbers.[54] Despite improving the quality and availability of kerosene products while greatly reducing their cost to the public (the price of kerosene dropped by nearly 80% over the life of the company), Standard Oil's business practices created intense controversy. Standard's most potent weapons against competitors were underselling, differential pricing, and secret transportation rebates.[55]
The firm was attacked by journalists and politicians throughout its existence, in part for these monopolistic methods, giving momentum to the antitrust movement. By 1880, according to the New York World, Standard Oil was "the most cruel, impudent, pitiless, and grasping monopoly that ever fastened upon a country". To critics Rockefeller replied, "In a business so large as ours ... some things are likely to be done which we cannot approve. We correct them as soon as they come to our knowledge."[56]
At that time, many legislatures had made it difficult to incorporate in one state and operate in another. As a result, Rockefeller and his associates owned dozens of separate corporations, each of which operated in just one state; the management of the whole enterprise was rather unwieldy. In 1882, Rockefeller's lawyers created an innovative form of corporation to centralize their holdings, giving birth to the Standard Oil Trust. The "trust" was a corporation of corporations, and the entity's size and wealth drew much attention. Nine trustees, including Rockefeller, ran the 41 companies in the trust.[57] The public and the press were immediately suspicious of this new legal entity, and other businesses seized upon the idea and emulated it, further inflaming public sentiment. Standard Oil had gained an aura of invincibility, always prevailing against competitors, critics, and political enemies. It had become the richest, biggest, most feared business in the world, seemingly immune to the boom and bust of the business cycle, consistently making profits year after year.[58]
The company's vast American empire included 20,000 domestic wells, 4,000 miles of pipeline, 5,000 tank cars, and over 100,000 employees.[58] Its share of world oil refining topped out above 90% but slowly dropped to about 80% for the rest of the century.[59] Despite the formation of the trust and its perceived immunity from all competition, by the 1880s Standard Oil had passed its peak of power over the world oil market. Rockefeller finally gave up his dream of controlling all the world's oil refining, he admitted later, "We realized that public sentiment would be against us if we actually refined all the oil."[59] Over time foreign competition and new finds abroad eroded his dominance. In the early 1880s, Rockefeller created one of his most important innovations. Rather than try to influence the price of crude oil directly, Standard Oil had been exercising indirect control by altering oil storage charges to suit market conditions. Rockefeller then ordered the issuance of certificates against oil stored in its pipelines. These certificates became traded by speculators, thus creating the first oil-futures market which effectively set spot market prices from then on. The National Petroleum Exchange opened in Manhattan in late 1882 to facilitate the trading of oil futures.[60]




Fear of monopolies ("trusts") is shown in this attack on Rockefeller's Standard Oil Company






Rockefeller as an industrial emperor, 1901 cartoon from Puck magazine


Although 85% of world crude production was still coming from Pennsylvania wells in the 1880s, drilling in Russia and Asia began to reach the world market.[61] Robert Nobel had established his own refining enterprise in the abundant and cheaper Russian oil fields, including the region's first pipeline and the world's first oil tanker. The Paris Rothschilds jumped into the fray providing financing.[62] Additional fields were discovered in Burma and Java. Even more critical, the invention of the light bulb gradually began to erode the dominance of kerosene for illumination. But Standard Oil adapted, developing a European presence, expanding into natural gas production in the U.S. then into gasoline for automobiles, which until then had been considered a waste product.[63]
Standard Oil moved its headquarters to New York City at 26 Broadway, and Rockefeller became a central figure in the city's business community. He bought a residence in 1884 on 54th Street near the mansions of other magnates such as William Henry Vanderbilt. Despite personal threats and constant pleas for charity, Rockefeller took the new elevated train to his downtown office daily.[64] In 1887, Congress created the Interstate Commerce Commission which was tasked with enforcing equal rates for all railroad freight, but by then Standard depended more on pipeline transport.[65] More threatening to Standard's power was the Sherman Antitrust Act of 1890, originally used to control unions, but later central to the breakup of the Standard Oil trust. Ohio was especially vigorous in applying its state anti-trust laws, and finally forced a separation of Standard Oil of Ohio from the rest of the company in 1892, the first step in the dissolution of the trust.[66]




Judge Kenesaw Mountain Landis wags his pen at John D. Rockefeller, who is sitting in the witness stand, during the Standard Oil case on July 6, 1907


In the 1890s, Rockefeller expanded into iron ore and ore transportation, forcing a collision with steel magnate Andrew Carnegie, and their competition became a major subject of the newspapers and cartoonists.[67] He went on a massive buying spree acquiring leases for crude oil production in Ohio, Indiana, and West Virginia, as the original Pennsylvania oil fields began to play out.[68] Amid the frenetic expansion, Rockefeller began to think of retirement. The daily management of the trust was turned over to John Dustin Archbold and Rockefeller bought a new estate, Pocantico Hills, north of New York City, turning more time to leisure activities including the new sports of bicycling and golf.[69]
Upon his ascent to the presidency, Theodore Roosevelt initiated dozens of suits under the Sherman Antitrust Act and coaxed reforms out of Congress. In 1901, U.S. Steel, then controlled by J. Pierpont Morgan, having bought Andrew Carnegie's steel assets, offered to buy Standard's iron interests as well. A deal brokered by Henry Clay Frick exchanged Standard's iron interests for U.S. Steel stock and gave Rockefeller and his son membership on the company’s board of directors. In full retirement at age 63, Rockefeller earned over $58 million in investments in 1902.[70]
One of the most effective attacks on Rockefeller and his firm was the 1904 publication of The History of the Standard Oil Company, by Ida Tarbell, a leading muckraker. She documented the company's espionage, price wars, heavy-handed marketing tactics, and courtroom evasions.[71] Although her work prompted a huge backlash against the company, Tarbell stated she was surprised at its magnitude. "I never had an animus against their size and wealth, never objected to their corporate form. I was willing that they should combine and grow as big and wealthy as they could, but only by legitimate means. But they had never played fair, and that ruined their greatness for me." Tarbell's father had been driven out of the oil business during the "South Improvement Company" affair.[citation needed] Rockefeller called her "Miss Tarbarrel" in private but held back in public saying only, "not a word about that misguided woman."[71] He began a publicity campaign to put his company and himself in a better light. Though he had long maintained a policy of active silence with the press, he decided to make himself more accessible and responded with conciliatory comments such as "capital and labor are both wild forces which require intelligent legislation to hold them in restriction." He wrote and published his memoirs beginning in 1908. Critics found his writing to be sanitized and disingenuous and thought that statements such as "the underlying, essential element of success in business is to follow the established laws of high-class dealing" seemed to be at odds with his true business methods.[72]
Rockefeller and his son continued to consolidate their oil interests as best they could until New Jersey, in 1909, changed its incorporation laws to effectively allow a re-creation of the trust in the form of a single holding company. Rockefeller retained his nominal title as president until 1911 and he kept his stock. At last in 1911, the Supreme Court of the United States found Standard Oil Company of New Jersey in violation of the Sherman Antitrust Act. By then the trust still had a 70% market share of the refined oil market but only 14% of the U.S. crude oil supply.[73] The court ruled that the trust originated in illegal monopoly practices and ordered it to be broken up into 34 new companies. These included, among many others, Continental Oil, which became Conoco, now part of ConocoPhillips; Standard of Indiana, which became Amoco, now part of BP; Standard of California, which became Chevron; Standard of New Jersey, which became Esso (and later, Exxon), now part of ExxonMobil; Standard of New York, which became Mobil, now part of ExxonMobil; and Standard of Ohio, which became Sohio, now part of BP. Pennzoil and Chevron have remained separate companies.[74]
Rockefeller, who had rarely sold shares, held over 25% of Standard's stock at the time of the breakup.[75] He and all of the other stockholders received proportionate shares in each of the 34 companies. In the aftermath, Rockefeller's control over the oil industry was somewhat reduced but over the next 10 years, the breakup also proved immensely profitable for him. The companies' combined net worth rose fivefold and Rockefeller’s personal wealth jumped to $900 million.[73]
Colorado Fuel and Iron




John D. Rockefeller around 1900 by Oscar White.


In 1902, facing cash flow problems, John Cleveland Osgood turned to George Jay Gould, a principle stockholder of the Denver and Rio Grande, for a loan.[76] Gould, via Frederick Taylor Gates, Rockefeller's financial adviser, brought John D. Rockefeller in to help finance the loan.[77] Analysis of the company's operations by John D. Rockefeller, Jr. showed a need for substantially more funds which were provided in exchange for acquisition of CF&I's subsidiaries such as the Colorado and Wyoming Railway Company, the Crystal River Railroad Company, and possibly the Rocky Mountain Coal and Iron Company. Control was passed from the Iowa Group[78] to Gould and Rockefeller interests in 1903 with Gould in control and Rockefeller and Gates representing a minority interests. Osgood left the company in 1904 and devoted his efforts to operating competing coal and coke operations.[79]
Strike of 1913–14 and the Ludlow Massacre
The strike, called in September 1913 by the United Mine Workers, over the issue of union representation, was against coal mine operators in Huerfano and Las Animas counties of southern Colorado, where the majority of CF&I's coal and coke production was located. The strike was fought vigorously by the coal mine operators association and its steering committee, which included Welborn, president of CF&I, a spokesman for the coal operators. Rockefeller's operative, Lamont Montgomery Bowers,[80] remained in the background. Few miners actually belonged to the union or participated in the strike call, but the majority honored it. Strikebreakers (called "scabs") were threatened and sometimes attacked. Both sides purchased substantial arms and ammunition. Striking miners were forced to abandon their homes in company towns and lived in tent cities erected by the union, such as the tent city at Ludlow, a railway stop north of Trinidad.[81]
Under the protection of the National Guard, some miners returned to work and some strikebreakers, imported from the eastern coalfields, joined them as Guard troops protecting their movements. In February 1914, a substantial portion of the troops were withdrawn, but a large contingent remained at Ludlow. On April 20, 1914, a general fire-fight occurred between strikers and troops, which was antagonized by the troops and mine guards. The camp was burned, resulting in 15 women and children, who hid in tents at the camp, being burned to death.[81][82] Costs to both mine operators and the union were high. This incident brought unwanted national attention to Colorado.
Due to reduced demand for coal, resulting from an economic downturn, many of CF&I's coal mines never reopened and many men were thrown out of work. The union was forced to discontinue strike benefits in February 1915. There was destitution in the coal fields. With the help of funds from the Rockefeller Foundation, relief programs were organized by the Colorado Committee on Unemployment and Relief. A state agency created by Governor Carlson, offered work to unemployed miners building roads and doing other useful projects.[81]
The casualties suffered at Ludlow were successfully labeled a massacre and mobilized public opinion against the Rockefellers and the coal industry. The United States Commission on Industrial Relations conducted extensive hearings, singling out John D. Rockefeller Jr. and the Rockefellers' relationship with Bowers for special attention. Bowers was relieved of duty and Wellborn restored to control in 1915, then industrial relations improved.[81] Rockefeller denied any responsibility and minimized the seriousness of the event.[83] When testifying on the Ludlow Massacre, and asked what action he would have taken as Director, John D. Rockefeller stated, "I would have taken no action. I would have deplored the necessity which compelled the officers of the company to resort to such measures to supplement the State forces to maintain law and order." Rockefeller admitted that he had made no attempt to bring the militiamen to justice.[84]
Illnesses and death




Rockefeller's grave in Lake View Cemetery, Cleveland


In his 50s Rockefeller suffered from moderate depression and digestive troubles; during a stressful period in the 1890s he developed alopecia, the loss of some or all body hair.[85]
By 1901 he began wearing toupées. His hair never grew back, but other health complaints subsided as he lightened his workload.[86]
Rockefeller died of arteriosclerosis on May 23, 1937, less than two months shy of his 98th birthday,[87] at "The Casements", his home in Ormond Beach, Florida. He was buried in Lake View Cemetery in Cleveland.
Personal life
Further information: Rockefeller family
Family
Against long-circulating speculations that his family has French roots, genealogists proved the German origin of Rockefeller and traced them back to the early 17th century. Thereupon Johann Peter Rockenfeller (baptized 27 September 1682 in the Protestant church of Rengsdorf) immigrated in 1723 from Altwied (today a district of Neuwied, Rhineland-Palatinate) with three children to North America and settled down in Germantown, Pennsylvania.[88][89]
The name Rockenfeller (from Rockenfeld) refers to Rockenfeld (English: distaff field) in the district of Neuwied.[citation needed]
Marriage




Kykuit in Westchester County, New York, where Rockefeller spent his retirement. It has been home to four generations of the Rockefeller family.


In 1864, Rockefeller married Laura Celestia "Cettie" Spelman (1839–1915), daughter of Harvey Buell Spelman and Lucy Henry. They had four daughters and one son together. He said later, "Her judgment was always better than mine. Without her keen advice, I would be a poor man."[32]

Elizabeth "Bessie" Rockefeller (August 23, 1866 – November 14, 1906)
Alice Rockefeller (July 14, 1869 – August 20, 1870)
Alta Rockefeller (April 12, 1871 – June 21, 1962)
Edith Rockefeller (August 31, 1872 – August 25, 1932)
John Davison Rockefeller, Jr. (January 29, 1874 – May 11, 1960)

The Rockefeller wealth, distributed as it was through a system of foundations and trusts, continued to fund family philanthropic, commercial, and, eventually, political aspirations throughout the 20th century. John Jr.'s youngest son David Rockefeller was a leading New York banker, serving for over 20 years as CEO of Chase Manhattan (now part of JPMorgan Chase). Second son, Nelson Aldrich Rockefeller, was Republican governor of New York and the 41st Vice President of the United States. Fourth son Winthrop Aldrich Rockefeller served as Republican Governor of Arkansas. Grandchildren Abigail Aldrich "Abby" Rockefeller and John Davison Rockefeller III became philanthropists. Grandson Laurance Spelman Rockefeller became a conservationist. Great-grandson John Davison "Jay" Rockefeller IV served from 1985 until 2015 as a Democratic Senator from West Virginia after serving as governor of West Virginia,[90] and another, Winthrop, served as Lieutenant Governor of Arkansas for a decade.
Religious views




The Euclid Avenue Baptist Church and its pastor, the Rev. Dr. Charles Aubrey Eaton in 1904.


John D. Rockefeller was born in Richford, New York, then part of the Burned-over district — a New York state area being the site of an evangelical revival known as the Second Great Awakening; it drew masses to various Protestant churches—especially Baptist ones—urging believers to follow such ideals as hard work, prayer and good deeds to build "the Kingdom of God on Earth". Early in his life, he regularly went with his siblings and mother Eliza to the local Baptist church — the Erie Street Baptist Church (later the Euclid Avenue Baptist Church) — an independent Baptist church which eventually came to associate with the Northern Baptist Convention (1907-1950; modern American Baptist Churches USA).[citation needed]
His mother was deeply religious and disciplined, and had a major influence on him in religious matters. During church service, his mother would urge him to contribute his few pennies to the congregation. He came to associate the church with charity. A Baptist preacher once encouraged him to "make as much money as he could, and then give away as much as he could".[91] Later in his life, Rockefeller recalled: "It was at this moment, that the financial plan of my life was formed". Money making was considered by him a God-given gift.[91]
A devout Northern Baptist, Rockefeller would read the Bible daily, attend prayer meetings twice a week and even led his own Bible study with his wife. Burton Folsom Jr. has noted, he sometimes gave tens of thousands of dollars to Christian groups, while, at the same time, he was trying to borrow over a million dollar to expand his business. His philosophy of giving was founded upon biblical principles. He truly believed in the biblical principle found in Luke 6:38, "Give, and it will be given to you. A good measure, pressed down, shaken together and running over, will be poured into your lap. For with the measure you use, it will be measured to you."[91]
Rockefeller would support Baptist missionary activity, fund universities, and heavily engage in religious activities at his Cleveland, Ohio church. While traveling the South, he would donate large sums of money to churches belonging to the Southern Baptist Convention, various Black churches, as well as other Christian denominations. One time, he paid for a slave's freedom and donated to a Roman Catholic orphanage. As he grew rich, his donations became more generous, especially to his church in Cleveland; nevertheless, it was demolished in 1925, and replaced with another building.[91]
Rumors
At the height of Rockefeller's power as monopolist there began rumors that the family guards an "embarrassing secret". Joseph Pulitzer offered a reward of $8,000 for information about John's father, Bill, aka "Doc Rockefeller".[92] However, journalists could not find him before his death, and only two years later the whole story was published.[93]
Bill, who traveled as a mountebank across the country, sometimes a glad-handing huckster or occasionally as "herbal doctor", although he had no legitimate medical training, abandoned his family around 1855, but remained legally married to Eliza up to her death. He adopted the name William Levingston and married, as a bigamist in Norwich, Ontario, Margaret L. Allen (1834–1910), without issue. He died in 1906 and his tomb was paid from the property of his second wife.[94]
Philanthropy




Rockefeller in 1911


Rockefeller's charitable giving began with his first job as a clerk at age 16, when he gave six percent of his earnings to charity, as recorded in his personal ledger. By the time he was twenty, his charity exceeded ten percent of his income. Much of his giving was church-related.[94] His church was later affiliated with the Northern Baptist Convention, which formed from American Baptists in the North with ties to their historic missions to establish schools and colleges for freedmen in the South after the American Civil War. Rockefeller attended Baptist churches every Sunday; when traveling he would often attend services at African-American Baptist congregations, leaving a substantial donation.[94] As Rockefeller's wealth grew, so did his giving, primarily to educational and public health causes, but also for basic science and the arts. He was advised primarily by Frederick Taylor Gates[95] after 1891,[96] and, after 1897, also by his son.
He was allegedly influenced[dubious – discuss] by a meeting with Swami Vivekananda, who urged him to use more of his philanthropy to help the poor and distressed people.[97][98]
Rockefeller believed in the Efficiency Movement, arguing that: "To help an inefficient, ill-located, unnecessary school is a waste ... it is highly probable that enough money has been squandered on unwise educational projects to have built up a national system of higher education adequate to our needs, if the money had been properly directed to that end."[99]
Rockefeller and his advisers invented the conditional grant, which required the recipient to "root the institution in the affections of as many people as possible who, as contributors, become personally concerned, and thereafter may be counted on to give to the institution their watchful interest and cooperation".[100]
In 1884, Rockefeller provided major funding for Atlanta Baptist Female Seminary in Atlanta for African-American women, which became Spelman College.[101] His wife Laura Spelman Rockefeller, was dedicated to civil rights and equality for women.[102] John and Laura donated money and supported the Atlanta Baptist Female Seminary whose mission was in line with their faith based beliefs. Today known as Spelman College, an all women Historical Black College or University <HBCU> in Atlanta, GA., named after Laura’s family. The Spelman Family, Rockefeller's in-laws, along with John Rockefeller were ardent abolitionists before the Civil War and were dedicated to supporting the Underground Railroad.[102] John Rockefeller was impressed by the vision of the school and removed the debt from the school. The oldest existing building on Spelman's campus, Rockefeller Hall, is named after him.[103] Rockefeller also gave considerable donations to Denison University[104] and other Baptist colleges.
Rockefeller gave $80 million to the University of Chicago[105] under William Rainey Harper, turning a small Baptist college into a world-class institution by 1900. He also gave a grant to the American Baptist Missionaries foreign mission board, the American Baptist Foreign Mission Society in establishing Central Philippine University, the first Baptist and second American university in Asia, in 1905 in the heavily Catholic Philippines.[106][107]




Rockefeller and his son John Jr. in 1915


Rockefeller's General Education Board, founded in 1903,[108] was established to promote education at all levels everywhere in the country.[109] In keeping with the historic missions of the Baptists, it was especially active in supporting black schools in the South.[109] Rockefeller also provided financial support to such established eastern institutions as Yale, Harvard, Columbia, Brown, Bryn Mawr, Wellesley and Vassar.
On Gates' advice, Rockefeller became one of the first great benefactors of medical science. In 1901, he founded the Rockefeller Institute for Medical Research[108] in New York City. It changed its name to Rockefeller University in 1965, after expanding its mission to include graduate education.[110] It claims a connection to 23 Nobel laureates.[111] He founded the Rockefeller Sanitary Commission in 1909,[108] an organization that eventually eradicated the hookworm disease,[112] which had long plagued rural areas of the American South. His General Education Board made a dramatic impact by funding the recommendations of the Flexner Report of 1910. The study had been undertaken by the Carnegie Foundation for the Advancement of Teaching.
Rockefeller created the Rockefeller Foundation in 1913[113] to continue and expand the scope of the work of the Sanitary Commission,[108] which was closed in 1915.[114]
He gave nearly $250 million to the foundation,[101] which focused on public health, medical training, and the arts. It endowed Johns Hopkins School of Hygiene and Public Health,[108] the first of its kind.[115] It also built the Peking Union Medical College in China into a notable institution.[104] The foundation helped in World War I war relief,[116] and it employed William Lyon Mackenzie King of Canada to study industrial relations.[117]
In the 1920s, the Rockefeller Foundation funded a hookworm eradication campaign through the International Health Division. This campaign used a combination of politics and science, along with collaboration between healthcare workers and government officials to accomplish its goals.[118]
Rockefeller's fourth main philanthropy, the Laura Spelman Rockefeller Memorial Foundation, was created in 1918.[119] Through this, he supported work in the social studies; this was later absorbed into the Rockefeller Foundation. In total Rockefeller donated about $550 million.[120]
Rockefeller became well known in his later life for the practice of giving dimes to adults and nickels to children wherever he went. He even gave dimes as a playful gesture to wealthy men, such as tire mogul Harvey Firestone.[121][122]
Florida home





This section does not cite any sources. Please help improve this section by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (November 2016) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Henry Flagler, one of the co-founders of Standard Oil along with Rockefeller, bought the Ormond Hotel in 1890, located in Ormond Beach, Florida, two years after it opened. Flagler expanded it to accommodate 600 guests and the hotel soon became one in a series of Gilded Age hotels catering to passengers aboard Flagler's Florida East Coast Railway. One of Flagler's guests at the Ormond Hotel was his former business partner John D. Rockefeller, who first stayed at the hotel in 1914. Rockefeller liked the Ormond Beach area so much that after four seasons at the hotel, he bought an estate in Ormond Beach called "The Casements". It would be Rockefeller's winter home during the latter part of his life. Sold by his heirs in 1939, it was purchased by the city in 1973 and now serves as a cultural center and is the community's best-known historical structure.
Legacy




John D. Rockefeller's painting by John Singer Sargent in 1917


Rockefeller had a long and controversial career in the oil industry followed by a long career in philanthropy. His image is an amalgam of all of these experiences and the many ways he was viewed by his contemporaries. These contemporaries include his former competitors, many of whom were driven to ruin, but many others of whom sold out at a profit (or a profitable stake in Standard Oil, as Rockefeller often offered his shares as payment for a business), and quite a few of whom became very wealthy as managers as well as owners in Standard Oil. They include politicians and writers, some of whom served Rockefeller's interests, and some of whom built their careers by fighting Rockefeller and the "robber barons".
Biographer Allan Nevins, answering Rockefeller's enemies, concluded:

The rise of the Standard Oil men to great wealth was not from poverty. It was not meteor-like, but accomplished over a quarter of a century by courageous venturing in a field so risky that most large capitalists avoided it, by arduous labors, and by more sagacious and farsighted planning than had been applied to any other American industry. The oil fortunes of 1894 were not larger than steel fortunes, banking fortunes, and railroad fortunes made in similar periods. But it is the assertion that the Standard magnates gained their wealth by appropriating "the property of others" that most challenges our attention. We have abundant evidence that Rockefeller's consistent policy was to offer fair terms to competitors and to buy them out, for cash, stock, or both, at fair appraisals; we have the statement of one impartial historian that Rockefeller was decidedly "more humane toward competitors" than Carnegie; we have the conclusion of another that his wealth was "the least tainted of all the great fortunes of his day."[123]

Biographer Ron Chernow wrote of Rockefeller:[124]

What makes him problematic—and why he continues to inspire ambivalent reactions—is that his good side was every bit as good as his bad side was bad. Seldom has history produced such a contradictory figure.[125]

Notwithstanding these varied aspects of his public life, Rockefeller may ultimately be remembered simply for the raw size of his wealth. In 1902, an audit showed Rockefeller was worth about $200 million—compared to the total national GDP of $24 billion then.[16][126]
His wealth continued to grow significantly (in line with U.S. economic growth) after as the demand for gasoline soared, eventually reaching about $900 million on the eve of the First World War, including significant interests in banking, shipping, mining, railroads, and other industries. According to the New York Times obituary, "it was estimated after Mr. Rockefeller retired from business that he had accumulated close to $1,500,000,000 out of the earnings of the Standard Oil trust and out of his other investments. This was probably the greatest amount of wealth that any private citizen had ever been able to accumulate by his own efforts."[127] By the time of his death in 1937, Rockefeller's remaining fortune, largely tied up in permanent family trusts, was estimated at $1.4 billion, while the total national GDP was $92 billion.[4] According to some methods of wealth calculation, Rockefeller's net worth over the last decades of his life would easily place him as the wealthiest known person in recent history. As a percentage of the United States' GDP, no other American fortune — including those of Bill Gates or Sam Walton — would even come close.[128]
Rockefeller, aged 86, penned the following words to sum up his life:[129]


I was early taught to work as well as play,
My life has been one long, happy holiday;
Full of work and full of play—
I dropped the worry on the way—
And God was good to me everyday.


See also

GE Building – The Rockefeller family office, Room 5600
Ivy Lee
List of German Americans
Ludlow Massacre
Rockefeller Center

Notes



^ This is his peak net worth. There are various estimates; most of them fluctuate between 300 and 400 billion USD. While there are some sources claiming extreme figures like 180 billion or 660 billion, most reliable sources give estimates in 300-400 billion range
^ The majority of sources claims 1.5%, while a minority 2% of the American gross domestic product. Both percentages were converted into fractions.[3]
^ Fortune Magazine lists the richest Americans not by the changing value of the dollar but by percentage of GDP: Rockefeller is credited with a Wealth/GDP of 1/65.[4]
^ That is two years after the dissolution of Standard Oil



References


^ "The All-Time Richest Americans". All the Money in the World. Forbes. September 14, 2007. Retrieved May 4, 2014. 
^ "The 20 Richest People Of All Time". Business Insider. September 2, 2010. Retrieved May 4, 2014. 
^ a b 10 Things You May Not Know About John D. Rockefeller, history.com; accessed October 21, 2016.
^ a b c "The Richest Americans". Fortune. CNN. Retrieved March 25, 2016. 
^ "The Wealthiest Americans Ever". The New York Times. July 15, 2007. Retrieved 2007-07-17. 
^ "Top 10 Richest Men of All Time". AskMen.com. Retrieved 2007-05-29. 
^ "The Rockefellers". PBS. Retrieved 2007-05-29. 
^ Daniel Gross (2006-07-02). "Giving It Away, Then and Now - The New York Times". Nytimes.com. Retrieved 2017-03-08. 
^ Achievements: A Century of Science for the Benefit of Humankind 1901-2001 by Elizabeth Hanson, p. 39
^ 10 richest people in the entire history, fbacs.com; accessed October 21, 2016.
^ Fosdick, Raymond Blaine (1989). The story of the Rockefeller Foundation. Transaction Publishers. ISBN 0-88738-248-7. 
^ "100 Years: The Rockefeller Foundation | Eradicating Hookworm · Health". Rockefeller Archive Center. Retrieved 2017-03-08. 
^ "100 Years: The Rockefeller Foundation | Hookworm: Exporting a Campaign · Health". Rockefeller Archive Center. Retrieved 2017-03-08. 
^ Martin, Albro (1999), "John D. Rockefeller", Encyclopedia Americana, 23 
^ Chernow 1998, p. 52.
^ a b "The 9 most amazing facts about John D. Rockefeller". Oil Patch Asia. 
^ Hofstadter 1992, p. 45.
^ Schultz, Duane P.; Schultz, Sydney Ellen, A History of Modern Psychology, p. 128 
^ Chernow 1998, p. 11.
^ Chernow 1998, p. 6.
^ Chernow, Ron (1998). "The Flimflam Man". New York Times. 
^ Chernow 1998, p. 43.
^ Segall 2001, p. 14.
^ Segall 2001, pp. 15–16.
^ The Philanthropists: John D. Rockefeller
^ Coffey, Ellen Greenman; Shuker, Nancy (1989), John D. Rockefeller, empire builder, Silver Burdett, pp. 18, 30 
^ Chernow 1998, p. 40.
^ Chernow 1998, p. 46.
^ a b c d Federal Reserve Bank of Minneapolis Community Development Project. "Consumer Price Index (estimate) 1800–". Federal Reserve Bank of Minneapolis. Retrieved January 2, 2017. 
^ Chernow 1998, p. 47.
^ Stevens, Mark (2008). Rich is a Religion: Breaking the Timeless Code to Wealth. John Wiley & Sons. p. 135. ISBN 978-0-470-25287-1. 
^ a b Segall 2001, p. 25.
^ Segall 2001, pp. 24–28.
^ Chernow 1998, pp. 54–55.
^ a b c Burton W. Folsom, The Myth of the Robber Barons, Chapter 5, John D. Rockefeller and the Oil Industry
^ Williamson and Daum, American Petroleum Industry, pp. 82-194
^ Chernow 1998, pp. 73–74.
^ a b c Nevins, Rockefeller, 1:183-85, 197-8
^ Segall 2001, p. 32.
^ Segall 2001, pp. 32, 35.
^ "People & Events: John D. Rockefeller Senior, 1839–1937". PBS. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ "Our History". ExxonMobil. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ a b c Yergin, Daniel (1992). The Prize: The Epic Quest for Oil, Money & Power. ISBN 978-1-4391-1012-6. 
^ Chernow 1998, p. 132.
^ Segall 2001, p. 42.
^ Segall 2001, p. 43.
^ Segall 2001, p. 44.
^ Segall 2001, p. 46.
^ Segall 2001, pp. 48–49.
^ Segall 2001, p. 52.
^ Chernow 1998, p. 171.
^ Segall 2001, p. 57.
^ Segall 2001, p. 58.
^ Chernow 1998, p. 253.
^ Chernow 1998, p. 258.
^ Segall 2001, p. 60.
^ Segall 2001, p. 61.
^ a b Chernow 1998, p. 249.
^ a b Segall 2001, p. 67.
^ Chernow 1998, p. 259.
^ Chernow 1998, p. 242.
^ Chernow 1998, p. 246.
^ Segall 2001, p. 68.
^ Segall 2001, pp. 62–63.
^ Rockefeller 1984, p. 48.
^ Segall 2001, p. 69.
^ Segall 2001, p. 77.
^ Chernow 1998, p. 287.
^ Segall 2001, pp. 79–80.
^ Segall 2001, p. 84.
^ a b Segall 2001, p. 89.
^ Segall 2001, p. 91.
^ a b Segall 2001, p. 93.
^ Segall 2001, p. 112.
^ Chernow 1998, p. 333.
^ Scamehorn, Chapter 1, "The Colorado Fuel and Iron Company, 1892–1903", page 17
^ Scamehorn, Chapter 1, "The Colorado Fuel and Iron Company, 1892–1903", page 18
^ Scamehorn, Chapter 1, "The Colorado Fuel and Iron Company, 1892–1903", page 19
^ Scamehorn, Chapter 1, "The Colorado Fuel and Iron Company, 1892–1903", page 20
^ "Lamont Montgomery Bowers". Retrieved March 3, 2016. 
^ a b c d Scamehorn, Chapter 3 "The Coal Miners' Strike of 1913–1914", pp. 38–55.
^ "Militia slaughters strikers at Ludlow, Colorado". History.com. Retrieved November 9, 2015. 
^ "The Ludlow Massacre". PBS. Retrieved 9 November 2015. 
^ "Rockefeller Says He Tries To Be Fair". The New York Times. May 21, 1915. 
^ "John D. Rockefeller Sr. and family timeline". PBS. Retrieved June 19, 2013. 
^ "John D Rockefeller:Infinitely Ruthless, Profoundly Charitable". HistoryAccess.com. Retrieved June 19, 2013. 
^ Michael, Evancar. "The Richest Man In History: Rockefeller is Born". Retrieved 2010-09-11. 
^ Chernow 1998, pp. 3, 10.
^ Scheiffarth, Engelbert (1969), "Der New Yorker Gouverneur Nelson A. Rockefeller und die Rockefeller im Neuwieder Raum", Genealogisches Jahrbuch (in German), 9: 16–41 
^ "ROCKEFELLER, John Davison IV (Jay) - Biographical Information". Biography. Biographical Directory of the United States Congress. 2015. Retrieved February 15, 2015. 
^ a b c d "Rockefellers" documentary
^ "The 9 most amazing facts about John D. Rockefeller". Oil Patch Asia. Retrieved January 2, 2014. 
^ John T. Flynn (1932). God's Gold [The Story of Rockefeller and His Times] (PDF). New York: Harcourt, Brace And Company. p. 467. ISBN 978-0-837-15588-3. Retrieved August 28, 2013. 
^ a b c Ron Chernow (1998). Titan [The Life of John D. Rockefeller Sr.]. The New York Times, Random House. pp. 50, 235. ISBN 0-679-43808-4. Retrieved August 28, 2013. 
^ Coon, Horace (1990). Money to burn: great American foundations and their money. Transaction Publishers. p. 27. ISBN 0-88738-334-3. 
^ Creager, Angela (2002). The life of a virus: tobacco mosaïc virus as an experimental model, 1930–1965. The University of Chichago Press. p. 42. ISBN 0-226-12025-2. 
^ Vivekananda, Swami; Lokeswarananda, Swami (1996). My India: the India eternal (1st ed.). Calcutta: Ramakrishna Mission Institute of Culture. p. 178. ISBN 81-85843-51-1. 
^ Kohn, Rachael (September 13, 2013). "The 19th century swami who influenced Rockefeller, Tesla and J.D. Salinger". Australian Broadcasting Corp. Retrieved January 14, 2015. 
^ Rockefeller 1984, p. 69.
^ Rockefeller 1984, p. 183.
^ a b Weir, Robert (2007). Class in America: Q-Z. Greenwood Press. p. 713. ISBN 978-0-313-34245-5. 
^ a b Laughlin, Rosemary. 2001. "John D. Rockefeller: Oil Baron and Philanthropist." Biography Reference Center, EBSCO
^ Miller-Bernal, Leslie (2006). Challenged by coeducation: women's colleges since the 1960s. Vanderbilt University Press. p. 235. ISBN 0-8265-1542-8. 
^ a b Fosdick, Raymond Blaine (1989). The story of the Rockefeller Foundation. Transaction Publishers. pp. 5, 88. ISBN 0-88738-248-7. 
^ Dobell, Byron (1985). A Sense of history: the best writing from the pages of American heritage. American Heritage Press. p. 457. ISBN 0-8281-1175-8. 
^ "WO Valentine", The Centennial Echo (brief biography), Central Philippine University, 2004, archived from the original on 2003-10-31, retrieved 2013-01-26 
^ Founder's Day Celebration, Central Philippine University, October 1, 2005, archived from the original on July 22, 2011, retrieved 2013-01-16 
^ a b c d e Brison, Jeffrey David (2005). Rockefeller, Carnegie, and Canada: American philanthropy and the arts and the arts and letters in Canada. McGill-Queen's University Press. pp. 27, 31, 62. ISBN 0-7735-2868-7. 
^ a b Jones-Wilson, Faustine Childress (1996). Encyclopedia of African-American education. Greenwood Press. p. 184. ISBN 0-313-28931-X. 
^ Unger, Harlow (2007). Encyclopedia of American Education: A to E. Infobase Publishing. p. 949. ISBN 0-8160-6887-9. 
^ Beaver, Robyn (2008). KlingStubbins: palimpsest. Images Publishing. p. 334. ISBN 978-1-86470-295-8. 
^ Hotez, Peter (2008). Forgotten people, forgotten diseases: the neglected tropical diseases and their impact on global health and development. ASM Press. p. 20. ISBN 978-1-55581-440-3. 
^ Klein, Henry (2005). Dynastic America and Those Who Own It. Cosimo. p. 143. ISBN 1-59605-671-1. 
^ Sealander, Judith (1997). Private wealth & public life: foundation philanthropy and the reshaping of American soclial policy from the Progressive Era to the New Deal. The Johns Hopkins University Press. p. 58. ISBN 0-8018-5460-1. 
^ Freeman, A.W. (July 1922). The Rotarian. p. 20. 
^ Schneider, William Howard (1922). Rockefeller philanthropy and modern biomedicine: international initiatives from World War I to Cold War. Indiana University Press. p. 11. ISBN 0-253-34151-5. 
^ Prewitt, Kenneth; Dogan, Mettei; Heydmann, Steven; Toepler, Stefan (2006). The legitimacy of philanthropic foundations: United States and European perspectives. Russell Sage Foundation. p. 68. ISBN 0-87154-696-5. 
^ Birn, Anne-Emanuelle; Solorzano, Armando (1999). "Public health policy paradoxes: science and politics in the Rockefeller Foundation's hookworm campaign in Mexico in the 1920s.". Social Science & Medicine. 49 (9): 1197–1213. PMID 10501641. doi:10.1016/S0277-9536(99)00160-4. 
^ "Laura Spelman Rockefeller Memorial Foundation". Famento. Retrieved April 21, 2011. 
^ The Philanthropy Hall of Fame, John D. Rockefeller Sr. profile, philanthropyroundtable.org; accessed October 21, 2016.
^ Chernow 1998, pp. 613–14.
^ "The 9 most amazing facts about John D. Rockefeller". Oil Patch Asia. Retrieved January 3, 2014. 
^ Latham 1949, p. 104.
^ Visser, Wayne (2011). The Age of Responsibility: CSR 2.0 and the New DNA of Business. John Wiley & Sons. ISBN 9781119973386. Retrieved July 19, 2014. 
^ Chernow 1998.
^ "US GDP". Measuring Worth. Retrieved 2010-09-11. 
^ "John D. Rockefeller and the Magnificent Bribe". Strike the Root: A Journal of Liberty. 2003-07-08. Retrieved 2010-09-11. 
^ Brian Warner (March 21, 2014). "The 30 Richest Americans Of All Time – Inflation Adjusted". Celebrity Net Worth. 
^ "Rockefeller" (PDF). ANBHF. Retrieved 2010-09-11. 


Bibliography


Bringhurst, Bruce (May 10, 1979). Antitrust and the Oil Monopoly: The Standard Oil Cases, 1890-1911 (Contributions in Legal Studies). Praeger. ISBN 978-0-313-20642-9. 
Chernow, Ron (1998). Titan: The Life of John D. Rockefeller, Sr. Random House. ISBN 978-0-679-43808-3. 
——— (1998). Titan: The Life of John D. Rockefeller, Sr. Warner. ISBN 0-679-75703-1. 
Collier, Peter; Horowitz, David (1976). The Rockefellers: An American Dynasty. New York: Holt, Rinehart & Winston. 
Ernst, Joseph W., editor. "Dear Father"/"Dear Son:" Correspondence of John D. Rockefeller and John D. Rockefeller, Jr. New York: Fordham University Press, with the Rockefeller Archive Center, 1994.
Folsom, Jr., Burton W. The Myth of the Robber Barons. New York: Young America, 2003.
Fosdick, Raymond B. The Story of the Rockefeller Foundation. New York: Transaction, reprint, 1989.
Gates, Frederick Taylor. Chapters in My Life. New York: The Free Press, 1977.
Giddens, Paul H. Standard Oil Company (Companies and men). New York: Ayer Co. Publishing, 1976.
Goulder, Grace. John D. Rockefeller: The Cleveland Years. Western Reserve Historical Society, 1972.
Harr, John Ensor, and Peter J. Johnson. The Rockefeller Century: Three Generations of America's Greatest Family. New York: Charles Scribner's Sons, 1988.
———; Johnson, Peter J. (1992). The Rockefeller Conscience: An American Family in Public and in Private. New York: Charles Scribner's Sons. 
Hawke, David Freeman. John D: The Founding Father of the Rockefellers. New York: Harper and Row, 1980.
Hidy, Ralph W. and Muriel E. Hidy. History of Standard Oil Company (New Jersey: Pioneering in Big Business). New York: Ayer Co., reprint, 1987.
Hofstadter, Richard (1992) [1944]. Social Darwinism in American Thought, 1860–1915. Philadelphia: University of Pennsylvania Press. ISBN 978-0-8070-5503-8. 
Jonas, Gerald. The Circuit Riders: Rockefeller Money and the Rise of Modern Science. New York: W.W. Norton & Co., 1989.
Josephson, Matthew. The Robber Barons. London: Harcourt, 1962.
Kert, Bernice. Abby Aldrich Rockefeller: The Woman in the Family. New York: Random House, 1993.
Klein, Henry H. Dynastic America and Those Who Own It. New York: Kessinger, [1921] 2003.
Knowlton, Evelyn H. and George S. Gibb. History of Standard Oil Company: Resurgent Years 1956.
Latham, Earl, ed. (1949). John D. Rockefeller: Robber Baron or Industrial Statesman?. 
Manchester, William. A Rockefeller Family Portrait: From John D. to Nelson. New York: Little, Brown, 1958.
Morris, Charles R. The Tycoons: How Andrew Carnegie, John D. Rockefeller, Jay Gould, and J. P. Morgan Invented the American Supereconomy. New York: Owl Books, reprint, 2006.
Nevins, Allan. John D. Rockefeller: The Heroic Age of American Enterprise. 2 vols. New York: Charles Scribner's Sons, 1940.
Nevins, Allan (1953). Study in Power: John D. Rockefeller, Industrialist and Philanthropist. 2 vols. New York: Charles Scribner's Sons. 
Pyle, Tom, as told to Beth Day. Pocantico: Fifty Years on the Rockefeller Domain. New York: Duell, Sloan and Pierce, 1964.
Roberts, Ann Rockefeller. The Rockefeller Family Home: Kykuit. New York: Abbeville Publishing Group, 1998.
Rockefeller, John D. (1984) [1909]. Random Reminiscences of Men and Events. New York: Sleepy Hollow Press and Rockefeller Archive Center. 
Rose, Kenneth W.; Stapleton, Darwin H. (1992). "Toward a ‘Universal Heritage’: Education and the Development of Rockefeller Philanthropy, 1884–1913". Teachers College Record. 93 (3): 536–55. ISSN 0161-4681. 
Sampson, Anthony (1975). The Seven Sisters: The Great Oil Companies and the World They Made. Hodder & Stoughton. 
Segall, Grant (2001-02-08). John D. Rockefeller: Anointed With Oil. Oxford University Press. ISBN 978-0-19512147-6. Retrieved December 19, 2012. 
Smith, Sharon. Rockefeller Family Fables Counterpunch May 8, 2008
Stasz, Clarice. The Rockefeller Women: Dynasty of Piety, Privacy, and Service. St. Martins Press, 1995.
Tarbell, Ida M. (1963) [1904]. The History of the Standard Oil Company. 2 vols. Gloucester, MA: Peter Smith. 
Williamson, Harold F. and Arnold R. Daum. The American Petroleum Industry: The Age of Illumination, 1959; also vol 2, American Petroleum Industry: The Age of Energy, 1964.
Yergin, Daniel. The Prize: The Epic Quest for Oil, Money, and Power. New York: Simon & Schuster, 1991.
Public Diary of John D. Rockefeller, now found in the Cleveland Western Historical Society


External links

Find more aboutJohn D. Rockefellerat Wikipedia's sister projects

Media from Commons
Quotations from Wikiquote
Data from Wikidata



The Rockefeller Archive Center
Complete text of The History of the Standard Oil Company
John D. Rockefeller Biography
Timeline of the Rockefeller family history since his birth
A genealogy of his family
Illustrated article about John D Rockefeller and the Standard Oil Company
Works by John D. Rockefeller at Project Gutenberg
Works by or about John D. Rockefeller at Internet Archive
Works by John D. Rockefeller at LibriVox (public domain audiobooks) 
Financier's Fortune in Oil Amassed in Industrial Era of 'Rugged Individualism' NY Times Obituary, May 24, 1937
A Capital Life A New York Times book review of "Titan" by Ron Chernow (1998).
American Experience: The Rockefellers A full transcript of the PBS documentary on the family history, with contributions from Paul Krugman and author Ron Chernow.
Booknotes interview with Ron Chernow on Titan: The Life of John D. Rockefeller, Sr., June 21, 1998.







v
t
e


Rockefeller family



children of William Avery Rockefeller (1810–1906)



John Davison Rockefeller (m.) Laura Celestia Spelman
William Avery Rockefeller Jr.
Franklin Rockefeller





children of John Davison Rockefeller (1839–1937)
children of William Avery Rockefeller Jr. (1841–1922)



Elizabeth Rockefeller (m.) Charles Augustus Strong
Alta Rockefeller
Edith Rockefeller (m.) Harold Fowler McCormick
John Davison Rockefeller Jr. (m.) Abigail Greene Aldrich
William Goodsell Rockefeller
Percy Avery Rockefeller
Ethel Geraldine Rockefeller (m.) Marcellus Hartley Dodge Sr.





children of Elizabeth Rockefeller (1866–1906)
children of Alta Rockefeller (1871–1962)
children of John Davison Rockefeller Jr. (1874–1960)



Margaret Rockefeller Strong
John Rockefeller Prentice
Abigail Aldrich Rockefeller (m.) Jean Mauzé
John Davison Rockefeller III (m.) Blanchette Ferry Hooker
Nelson Aldrich Rockefeller (m. 1st) Mary Todhunter Clark (m. 2nd) Margaretta Large Fitler
Laurance Spelman Rockefeller (m.) Mary French
Winthrop Aldrich Rockefeller
David Rockefeller





children of William Goodsell Rockefeller (1870–1922)
children of Percy Avery Rockefeller (1878–1934)
children of Ethel Geraldine Rockefeller (1882–1973)



Godfrey Stillman Rockefeller
James Stillman Rockefeller
Isabel Stillman Rockefeller (m.) Frederic Walker Lincoln IV
Avery Rockefeller
Marcellus Hartley Dodge Jr.





children of John Rockefeller Prentice (1902–1972)



Abra Prentice





children of John Davison Rockefeller III (1906–1978)
children of Nelson Aldrich Rockefeller (1908–1979)
children of Laurance Spelman Rockefeller (1910–2004)
children of Winthrop Aldrich Rockefeller (1912–1973)
children of David Rockefeller (1915–2017)
children of Godfrey Stillman Rockefeller (1899–1983)



John Davison Rockefeller IV
Hope Aldrich Rockefeller
Alida Ferry Rockefeller
Rodman Clark Rockefeller
Steven Clark Rockefeller
Michael Clark Rockefeller
Mark Fitler Rockefeller
Laura Spelman Rockefeller
Marion French Rockefeller
Lucy Aldrich Rockefeller
Laurance Spelman Rockefeller Jr.


Winthrop Paul Rockefeller

Abigail Aldrich Rockefeller
Margaret Dulany Rockefeller
Richard Gilder Rockefeller
Eileen Rockefeller
Godfrey Anderson Rockefeller





children of John Davison Rockefeller IV (1937)



Justin Aldrich Rockefeller





children of Rodman Clark Rockefeller (1932–2000)



Meile Louise Rockefeller









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 8183009
LCCN: n79095196
ISNI: 0000 0001 2119 7891
GND: 118745603
SUDOC: 076060055
BNF: cb14639280k (data)
NDL: 00621391










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=John_D._Rockefeller&oldid=784757268"					
Categories: 1839 births1937 deaths19th-century American businesspeopleAmerican accountantsAmerican billionairesAmerican businesspeople in the oil industryAmerican company foundersAmerican investorsAmerican people of English descentAmerican people of German descentAmerican people of Scotch-Irish descentAmerican philanthropistsAmerican railway entrepreneursBaptists from the United StatesBurials at Lake View Cemetery, ClevelandFellows of the Royal Society (Statute 12)Founders of the petroleum industryHistory of ClevelandMarathon OilBusinesspeople from ClevelandPeople from Mount Pleasant, New YorkPeople from Ormond Beach, FloridaPeople with alopecia universalisRockefeller familyRockefeller FoundationProgressive Era in the United StatesUniversity and college foundersUniversity of Chicago peopleRockefeller University peopleCentral Philippine UniversityStandard OilPeople from Moravia, New YorkPeople from Richford, New YorkGilded AgeBusinesspeople from New YorkBusinesspeople from FloridaHidden categories: CS1 German-language sources (de)Wikipedia indefinitely semi-protected pagesGood articlesInfobox person using certain parameters when deadArticles with hCardsArticles with attributed pull quotesAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from October 2016Articles with unsourced statements from September 2016Articles with unsourced statements from November 2016All accuracy disputesArticles with disputed statements from July 2016Articles needing additional references from November 2016All articles needing additional referencesArticles with Project Gutenberg linksArticles with Internet Archive linksArticles with LibriVox linksWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


العربيةAsturianuAzərbaycancaবাংলাBân-lâm-gúБеларускаяBislamaБългарскиབོད་ཡིགCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEestiΕλληνικάEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFrançais한국어ՀայերենHrvatskiBahasa IndonesiaÍslenskaItalianoעבריתქართულიҚазақшаLatinaLatviešuLietuviųMagyarМакедонскиMalagasyमराठीမြန်မာဘာသာNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskPiemontèisPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийScotsSimple EnglishSlovenščinaСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaதமிழ்ไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوTiếng ViệtWinaray粵語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 9 June 2017, at 22:06.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Nikon  AF-S NIKKOR 50mm f/1.8G Lens 2199 B&H Photo Video












































































































 












					
						Other B&H Sites - Gov, EDU & Corp.



B&H Main sitetwubucbfzxfu


Federal Marketplace


Students & Educators


Government, Education & Corporate




Read 

800.606.6969 / 212.444.6615
Help
About Us

Live Chat
				




The Professional's Source
Since 1973


FREE NYC STORE PICKUP Ready Within the Hour
>> Free Shipping on most orders over $49






twubucbfzxfu







 























Hello,
Log In


		    Sign In Login/Register


My Account 







0
My Cart









Log Into Your Account

Log In


Create a B&H Account






My Account





My Orders




Wish List









Sign Out




My Account





My Orders




Wish List




Notifications
   











Photography
Computers
Pro Video
Lighting
Pro Audio
Mobile
TVs & Entertainment
Camcorders
Surveillance
Optics
Audio-Visual
Used



			Specials
		







									Specials & Rebates See All Specials >








1 of  Deals Today





















































 

Details 







				Most orders* over $49 qualify for .

							Orders placed after 4pm on weekdays will not ship until the next business day. Orders placed after 12pm Fridays will not ship until the following Monday. 
			Faster shipping methods may be available; just upgrade during checkout.

			*Some exclusions apply.
Close








				Shipping Location
			

				Enter new zip code to refresh estimated delivery time.
			


Update


				Unrecognized Zip Code
			












Home
 
					
						
							
							Photography
						
					
				 
 
					
						
							
							Lenses
						
					
				 
 
					
						
							
							
								SLR Lenses
							
							
							
						
					
				 
 Nikon AF-S  











Nikon
 AF-S NIKKOR 50mm f/1.8G Lens
										
									








Nikon

								
									AF-S NIKKOR 50mm f/1.8G Lens
								
							





								B&H # NI5018GAF
								
									
									
									 
							
MFR # 2199










twubucbfzxfu


									Authorized Dealer
								









Wish List Spotlight:
        This item appears on a featured B&H industry insider's Spotlight Wish List
    






Most Wishable:
        This item pops up most often on B&H customer Wish Lists
    






Most Giftable:
        This item has been gifted most often by B&H customers.
    






Top Markdown:
        This item's price has dropped. Take advantage while the savings lasts!
    




















Front Lens View



Back Lens View





Show MoreLess





360° View





Customer Photos




Close






 
 

























Now Viewing: 































In Stock



Update Location
close



Enter new zip code to refresh estimated delivery time.

Update


Unrecognized Zip Code





		
			Order
		
	
		
			in the next
			0:00:00

	
		to ship
		
today



X

							
 								Place your order by 4pm Mon Jul 24 and your order will ship the same day. For further details see delivery estimates in cart. International orders are processed the next shipping day.
								
						




Free Expedited Shippingtwubucbfzxfu






							
								Product Highlights
							
							
						

F Mount Lens/FX Format
Aperture Range: f/1.8 to 16
One Aspherical Lens Element
Super Integrated Lens Coating
Silent Wave Motor AF System
M/A Mode; Manual Focus Override
Minimum Focus Distance: 17.7"
Filter Diameter: 58mm
Seven-Blade Diaphragm

Show moreShow less











								Reviews 1441



Q&A













See Used

from
$159.95






			$0.00 Tax Collected Outside NY and NJ 


Sales Tax

							B&H only collects sales tax on orders shipped to addresses in the States of New York and New Jersey.

						You may be responsible for state and local sales/use taxes when filing your tax returns. Please check your local sales tax laws.
				








								You Pay:
							

								
								
									
									
										$216.95
										







Receive 4% Reward 











Qty

Add to Cart


View Cart















										Add to Wish List
									

 Item in Wish List
									















Essential Kits


Shop Used
							
								
								
								
								
								
								
								from
							
                            $159.95twubucbfzxfu

trade in your gear for cash






 
Email


Print






   








Overview

twubucbfzxfu



Specs





Quick Compare





Reviews 
										1441





Q&A 
										





Accessories





 
to top












1Description











9 of the Best Gifts for Photographer Moms
Read More 







The AF-S NIKKOR 50mm f/1.8G Lens from Nikon is an attractive alternative to the classic 50mm f/1.4 "normal" lens for everyday shooting with an FX or 35mm camera. The 50mm f/1.8 is nearly as "fast" as the f/1.4 and provides reduced lens flare and ghosting as well as superior color consistency through the use of Nikon's Super Integrated Lens Coating. One aspherical lens element virtually eliminates coma and spherical aberration.Nikon's Silent Wave Motor gives you smooth, silent and precise autofocus operation, and the M/A mode lets you quickly and easily override the autofocus system for fine manual focusing. This lens is also compatible with DX cameras and when used with a DX camera, the angle of view would be equivalent to a 75mm focal length lens.




Fast f/1.8 Compact FX-Format Prime Lens 


										
												This updated classic with a fast maximum aperture is ideal for everyday shooting, perfect in low lighting situations and great for shallow depth of field control, producing images with beautiful background blur. When used on DX-format DSLRs its 35mm focal length equivalency is 75mm.
										  
										 


Shoot Tack-Sharp Portraits Every Time 


										
												Nikon's Super Integrated Coating (SIC) enhances light transmission efficiency and offers superior color consistency and reduced flare, while an aspherical lens element virtually eliminates coma and other types of aberrations, even when shooting at the widest available aperture.
										  
										 


Quiet Autofocus 


										
												A significant innovation in AF lens technology, Nikon's Silent Wave Motor uses ultrasonic (inaudible) vibrations-rather than a gear system-to focus the lens, providing incredibly smooth, silent and precise autofocus operation.
										  
										 


Quick Switching from AF to MF 


										
												When fine manual focusing is needed, simply rotate the lens focus ring. M/A mode allows you to seamlessly override the AF system with virtually no time lag.
										  
										 





UPC: 018208021994





															In the Box
														



									Nikon AF-S NIKKOR 50mm f/1.8G Lens
								



								
									
									58mm Snap-On Lens Cap
							    
							    	



								
									
									LF-4 Rear Lens Cap
							    
							    	



								
									
									HB-47 Bayonet Lens Hood for AF-S 50mm f/1.4G
							    
							    	



								
									
									CL-1013 Soft Lens Case 
							    
							    	twubucbfzxfu


								
								
									
									
										Limited 1-Year Warranty
									
								
							

								
								
									
									
										Limited 4-Year USA Extension upon Registration
									
								
							






 









Macro Lens Buying Guide
Todd Vorenkamp
05/15/2017









Primes Lenses to Replace your Zooms
Shawn C. Steiner
11/14/2016


















Table of Contents

1Description
















Performance




								Focal Length
									
									
									
							

								50mm Comparable 35mm Equivalent on DX Format Focal Length: 75 mm
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Aperture
									
									
									
							

								Maximum: f/1.8Minimum: f/16
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Camera Mount Type
									
									
									
							

								Nikon F
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Format Compatibility
									
									
									
							

								Nikon FX/35mm FilmNikon DX
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Angle of View
									
									
									
							

								47°DX Picture Angle: 31° 30'
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Minimum Focus Distance
									
									
									
							

								1.48' (45 cm)
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Magnification
									
									
									
							

								0.15x
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Maximum Reproduction Ratio
									
									
									
							

								1:7
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Elements/Groups
									
									
									
							

								7 / 6
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Diaphragm Blades
									
									
									
							

								7
	                                
	                                
	                                
							







Features




								Image Stabilization
									
									
									
							

								No
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Autofocus
									
									
									
							

								Yes
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Tripod Collar
									
									
									
							

								No
	                                
	                                
	                                
							







Physical




								Filter Thread
									
									
									
							

								Front:58 mm
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Dimensions (DxL)
									
									
									
							

								Approx. 2.8 x 2.1" (7.11 x 5.33 cm)
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Weight
									
									
									
							

								6.53 oz (185 g)
	                                
	                                
	                                
							







Packaging Info




				Package Weight
			

				1.0 lb
			



				Box Dimensions (LxWxH)
			

				6.5 x 5.0 x 5.0"
			
















Be the first to review this item

Write a reviewtwubucbfzxfu



Customer Photos


 













































































































































































































































				See any errors on this page?
				
					Let us know.
				





Close
Close
Close


    	Please enable javascript for your best B&H experience.
    













Loading 

















SunTrust Banks - Wikipedia




















 







SunTrust Banks

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


SunTrust Banks, Inc.





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: STI
S&P 500 Component


Industry
Banking


Founded
1985; 32 years ago (1985)


Headquarters
SunTrust Plaza
Atlanta, Georgia, U.S.



Number of locations

1,400 branches
2,160 ATMs[1]



Area served

Southeastern United States



Key people

William H. Rogers, Jr.
Chairman and CEO


Products
Financial Services


Revenue
 US$8.2 billion (FY 2013)[2]



Net income

 US$1.34 billion (FY 2013)[2]


Total assets
 US$204.875 billion (2016)[3]


Total equity
 US$21.4 billion (FY 2013)[4]



Number of employees

24,000 (09/01/2016)


Website
SunTrust.com






SunTrust locations in the United States.


SunTrust Banks, Inc., is an American bank holding company. The largest subsidiary is SunTrust Bank. It had US$175 billion in assets as of December 31, 2013.[5] SunTrust Bank's most direct corporate parent was established in 1891 in Atlanta, where its headquarters remain.
As of September 2016, SunTrust Bank operates 1,400 bank branches and 2,160 ATMs across 11 southeastern states and Washington, D.C..[1] The bank's primary businesses include deposits, lending, credit cards, and trust and investment services. Through its various subsidiaries, the company provides corporate and investment banking, capital market services, mortgage banking, and wealth management. It has nearly 24,000 employees.



Contents


1 History

1.1 Trust Company of Georgia
1.2 Sun Bank
1.3 Transformational merger


2 Current operations and structure

2.1 Executives


3 Relationship with Coca-Cola
4 2014 National Mortgage Settlement
5 Controversies
6 Buildings and branches
7 References
8 External links



History
Trust Company of Georgia
On 21 September 1891, SunTrust's most direct corporate ancestor, the Trust Company of Georgia, was granted a charter by the Georgia General Assembly as the Commercial Travelers' Savings Bank.[6] The founders were John M. Green, Joel Hurt, H. L. Atwater, W. A. Hansell, T. J. Hightower, J. G. Oglesby, J. D. Turner, John B. Daniel, Joseph Hirsch, Leon Lieberman, Louis Wellhouse, A. J. McBride, D. O. Dougherty, W. A. Gregg, W. W. Draper, A. C. Hook, W. T. Ashford, George W. Brooke, C. I. Branan, and C. D. Montgomery.[7]
In November 1893, it restructured as a trust company and renamed itself Trust Company of Georgia.[7][8]
Sun Bank
The earliest predecessor of Sun Bank was founded in 1911 as The People's National Bank. In 1920, it became the First National Bank. During the Great Depression, the First National Bank and Trust Company failed in the early 1930s. It was reorganized on Valentine’s Day 1934 as the First National Bank at Orlando.[6] In 1973, the bank merged with other Orlando banks to become Sun Banks.[9] It had three bank-related subsidiaries and total assets of $1.713 billion as of December 31, 1973.[10]
In the early 1980s, Sun went on a buying spree that raised at least some eyebrows, as it positioned the bank for the state of Florida to eventually allow interstate banking. It rolled up 81-year-old Hillsboro Bank, based in Plant City, an institution with $150 million in assets and then the third-oldest state-chartered bank. It also bought Florida State Bank of Tallahassee, which had tried to merge with Sun in 1973, but the deal fell apart when the economy soured.[11]
Then, in May 1983, Sun announced a deal for Miami-based Flagship Bank Inc., with $3.3 billion in assets, that catapulted Sun to be one of the Florida's largest bank holding companies. The Flagship deal was the seventh struck by Sun in less than a year.[11]
Transformational merger
The current SunTrust Banks, Inc., was the result of a merger between the Trust Company of Georgia and SunBanks, Inc., of Orlando, Florida in 1985. The merged company operated as Trust Company Bank in Georgia and Sun Bank in Florida until 1995, when all banks took the SunTrust name.
In 1986, shortly after the Trust Company–SunBanks merger, SunTrust purchased Third National Corporation of Nashville, though it continued to use the Third National name in Tennessee until 1995. SunTrust purchased Crestar Financial Corporation of Richmond, Virginia in 1998 expanding the company’s footprint into Virginia, Maryland, and the District of Columbia. Crestar's (and SunTrust's) earliest predecessor, Farmers Bank of Alexandria, was founded in 1811.[12]
In 1988, Suntrust is added to the S&P 500 Stock Price Index.[12]
In 2001, SunTrust purchased the institutional businesses of the Robinson-Humphrey Company, LLC. creating SunTrust Robinson-Humphrey.
The company bought Memphis-based National Commerce Financial Corporation (NCF) for $7 billion in 2004. The bank operated as National Bank of Commerce in South Carolina, Tennessee, Mississippi, Arkansas, Alabama, Georgia, Virginia, and West Virginia and as Central Carolina Bank and Trust in North Carolina. This acquisition allowed SunTrust to enter Alabama, the Carolinas, and West Virginia for the first time, and substantially increased its footprint in the other states.[13]
In 2013, the bank led a bank group that included Fifth Third Bank and Florida Community Bank that helped finance the acquirement of BEL USA, the parent company that owns DiscountMugs, by Comvest Partners, a private equity firm.[14][15][16]
In 2014, SunTrust announced it would launch a medical specialty group to work with independent medical practices.[17]
On Sept. 16, 2014, the Atlanta Braves announced the name of their new Cobb County stadium: SunTrust Park.[18] SunTrust Park, which is expected to be unveiled in time for the first pitch of the 2017 season, will serve as the new home of the Atlanta Braves. The $1.1 billion construction project in Cobb County will include restaurants, shops, offices, a hotel, and residential spaces directly connected to the park. The Braves organization is making history by building out the development at the same time the stadium is being constructed.[19]
Current operations and structure
The company operates three primary business units: Consumer Banking & Private Wealth Management, Wholesale Banking, and Mortgage.[20]

Business Mix, as of June 30, 2016[20]

Business Line
Percentage of Revenue


Consumer Banking
32%


Corporate & Investment Banking
20%


Commercial & Business Banking
14%


Private Wealth Management
12%


Mortgage
11%


Consumer Lending
8%


Commercial Real Estate
3%


As of September 2016, SunTrust Bank operates 1,400 bank branches and 2,160 ATMs across including Alabama, Arkansas, Florida, Georgia, Maryland, Mississippi, North Carolina, South Carolina, Tennessee, Virginia, West Virginia, and Washington, D.C.[1]
Executives


Individual (Position)
Years


William H. Rogers, Jr. (Chairman, President and CEO)
2011 – Present


James M. Wells, III (Chairman, President and CEO)
2007 – 2011


L. Phillip Humann (Chairman, President and CEO)
1998 – 2007


James B. “Jimmy” Williams (Chairman, President and CEO)
1990 – 1998


Robert M. Strickland (Chairman/SunTrust; president of Trust Company in 1973)
1978 – 1990


On April 21, 2011, William H. Rogers, Jr. began a transition into the CEO role previously held by Jim Wells, who retired December 31, 2011. Formerly SunTrust's COO, Rogers assumed the title of CEO on June 1, 2011. Rogers had been named President in 2008.[21] At that time, the current Chief Financial Officer (CFO) is Aleem Gillani was named in April 2011.[22]
In 2015 and 2016, two corporate treasurers have gone on to become CFOs at large regional banks, including Kevin Blair at Zions Bancorporation and Paul Burdiss at Synovus,[23][24] and a unit strategy head, Inder M. Singh, became CFO at IT firm Unisys.[25]
Relationship with Coca-Cola
SunTrust had a long-standing relationship with The Coca-Cola Company. In 1919, Ernest Woodruff, president of the Trust Company from 1904 to 1922, and W. C. Bradley bought The Coca-Cola Company for $25 million and restructured. The Trust Company of Georgia helped underwrite the initial public offering, accepting shares of Coke in exchange for its services.[8] Four years later, his son, Robert W. Woodruff, was elected Coca-Cola's president, a title he would hold until 1954 and was a board member until 1984.
As a result, SunTrust owned 48.3 million shares (3.58%) of Coke as of 2006, which had a GAAP cost basis of $110,000. In addition, the original copy of the formula for Coca-Cola was stored in a safe deposit box of an eventual SunTrust location in Atlanta (originally a Trust Company Bank location) from 1925 to 2011.[26] It was eventually moved to a purpose built vault in the World of Coca-Cola, also in Atlanta.[27]
Over the years, Coca-Cola executives would sit on SunTrust's board of directors[28] and SunTrust execs would sit on Coca-Cola's board.[29]
SunTrust started to divest Coke shares in May 2007, when it sold 4.5 million, or 9% of its position.[30] In 2008, the bank sold another 10 million shares, donated 3.6 million to SunTrust's charitable foundation, and crafted a plan to sell more shares in 2014 and 2015.[31]
However, in September 2012, SunTrust sold all of its Coke shares at the behest of its primary regulator, the Federal Reserve.[32] SunTrust was forced to resubmit its capital plan – known as Comprehensive Capital Analysis and Review (CCAR) – after it failed part of the stress test in March 2012. The Coke shares (or any stock holding) held by SunTrust would weigh on the bank's capital ratio under new capital rules within Basel III. Thus, SunTrust decided to accelerate its plan and sold the Coke shares earlier than expected.[33]
2014 National Mortgage Settlement
In 2014, the Federal government together with state attorneys general in 49 states and the District of Columbia reached a settlement requiring SunTrust Mortgage, Inc., to provide $500 million in various forms of relief to mortgage borrowers. The United States District Court for the District of Columbia entered the Consent Order on September 30, 2014. The consent order addressed SunTrust's alleged misconduct regarding its mortgage servicing and foreclosure practices. SunTrust was also required to create a 40 million dollar fund for the approximately 45,000 SunTrust borrowers who were foreclosed upon between January 1, 2008 and December 31, 2013. In addition, SunTrust was required to adhere to significant new homeowner protections. The consent order required that SunTrust follow the servicing standards set up by the 2012 National Mortgage Settlement (NMS) with the five largest banks.
Controversies
In September 2015 SunTrust laid off one hundred IT professionals with a controversial severance agreement clause by SunTrust that required laid-off employees to be available to help without pay for a period of two years. On October, 23rd Suntrust reversed course and removed the clause: "to make myself reasonably available to SunTrust regarding matters in which I have been involved in the course of my employment with SunTrust and/or about which I have knowledge as a result of my employment with SunTrust."[34]
Buildings and branches
Located at 200 South Orange Avenue, The SunTrust Center is the tallest building in downtown Orlando, Florida. The 35 story, 650,000 sq ft (60,000 m2) building was constructed in 1988 at a cost of approximately $100 million.[citation needed] It is constructed of reinforced concrete and granite with marble finishes and features 17 elevators.







SunTrust Plaza in Atlanta, Georgia









Suntrust Bank in Gaithersburg, Maryland









SunTrust Building in Washington, D.C.









SunTrust Tower in Jacksonville, Florida









SunTrust Center in Orlando, Florida









SunTrust building in Tampa, Florida









SunTrust branch in Durham, North Carolina









SunTrust Bank in Hendersonville, Tennessee




References


^ a b c "SunTrust Corporate Profile". SunTrust.com. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ a b SunTrust Banks (STI) annual SEC income statement filing via Wikinvest
^ https://www.nyse.com/quote/XNYS:STI
^ SunTrust Banks (STI) annual SEC balance sheet filing via Wikinvest
^ "FDIC Institution Directory: SunTrust Bank". 
^ a b "Historical Highlight". SunTrust.com. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ a b Garrett, Franklin M. (1969). Atlanta and environs : A Chronicle of Its People and Events, 1880s-1930s. Athens, Ga.: University of Georgia Press. p. 235. ISBN 0-8203-0264-3. 
^ a b Borowsky, Bruce (2005-03-11). "SunTrust Banks (Trust Company Bank)". New Georgia Encyclopedia. Georgia Humanities Council. Retrieved 2006-12-10. 
^ "Orlando City Planning" (PDF). CityofOrlando.net. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ "Sun Bank Earnings Reported". Lakeland Ledger. February 12, 1975. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ a b Stuart, Reginald (May 16, 1983). "FLORIDA'S BANK-MERGER SPREE". New York Times. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ a b https://www.suntrust.com/docs/pdf/newsroom/history_highlights.pdf
^ "SunTrust to buy National Commerce Financial". Atlanta Business Chronicle. 2004-05-09. p. 1. Retrieved 2007-04-08. 
^ "Comvest Invests in BEL USA, Adds On Branders.com". PitchBook. 17 March 2014. Retrieved 30 December 2014. 
^ Dunford, Thomas (24 December 2013). "The Morning Leverage: What’s Waiting in Private Equity’s Stocking?". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 30 December 2014. 
^ "Comvest Investment Partners IV, L.P.; Amin Rahman Ramjee". Federal Trade Commission. 20 December 2013. Retrieved 30 December 2014. 
^ Correia, Margarida. "SunTrust Private Wealth Management Launches Medical Specialty Group". Bank Investment Consultant. Retrieved 27 June 2014. 
^ Tucker, Tim (16 September 2014). "Braves name their new stadium: SunTrust Park". ajc.com. Retrieved 26 May 2015. 
^ Riley, Cindy (13 May 2015). "SunTrust Park to House Atlanta Braves in 2017". constructionequipmentguide.com. Retrieved 26 May 2015. 
^ a b "Barclays Global Presentation" (PDF). SunTrust.com. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ Bizjournals
^ "Aleem Gillani". Suntrust.com. Retrieved 30 September 2016. 
^ Adams, Tony (July 11, 2016). "Synovus taps SunTrust executive for chief financial officer". ledger-enquirer.com. Retrieved 30 September 2016. 
^ Nemeroff, Evan (March 20, 2015). "Zions Taps SunTrust Treasurer to Replace Retiring Chief Financial Officer". American Banker. Retrieved 30 September 2016. 
^ "Chief Financial Officer (CFO) Janet Haugen to Retire from Unisys; Company Names Inder M. Singh to Succeed Haugen as CFO". Retrieved 30 September 2016. 
^ Coporate. "Coca-Cola Moves Its Secret Formula to The World of Coca-Cola". Coca-Cola Journey. Coca-Cola Company. Retrieved 28 June 2016. 
^ Stafford, Leon. "Coke hides its secret formula in plain sight in World of Coca-Cola move". The Atlanta Journal-Constitution. The Atlanta Journal-Constitution. Retrieved 28 June 2016. 
^ "Officers & Directors". SunTrust Banks, Inc. Retrieved 2007-04-08. 
^ "Board Of Directors". The Coca-Cola Company. Retrieved 2007-04-08. 
^ "SunTrust Selling Coke". USAToday.com. May 15, 2007. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ Gross, Daniel (7/23/08). "DESPERATE BANKS SELLING OFF HARD ASSETS". Newsweek. Retrieved 23 September 2016.  Check date values in: |date= (help)
^ MATTHIAS RIEKER and SAABIRA CHAUDHURI (October 22, 2012). "SunTrust Profit Soars on Coke Stock Sale". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ Benoit, David (September 6, 2012). "SunTrust Sells Coke Shares and Bad Loans". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ http://www.computerworld.com/article/2996527/it-outsourcing/in-turnabout-suntrust-removes-contentious-severance-clause.html


External links

SunTrust Banks, Inc. - official site



Business data for SunTrust Banks: Google Finance
Yahoo! Finance
Reuters
SEC filings



Yahoo! - SunTrust Banks, Inc. Company Profile







v
t
e


50 largest banks and bank holding companies in the United States






Ally
American Express
Bank of America
Bank of New York Mellon
Barclays*
BB&T
BBVA*
BMO*
BNP Paribas*
Capital One
Charles Schwab
CIT
Citigroup
Citizens
Comerica
Credit Suisse*
Deutsche Bank*
Discover
E-Trade
Fifth Third
Goldman Sachs
HSBC*
Huntington
JPMorgan Chase
KeyBank
M&T
Mizuho*
Morgan Stanley
MUFG Union Bank*
Mutual of Omaha
New York Community
Northern Trust
People's United
PNC
Popular
Royal Bank of Canada*
Regions
Banco Santander*
State Farm
State Street
SunTrust
SVB
Synchrony
Toronto Dominion*
TIAA
U.S. Bancorp
UBS*
USAA
Wells Fargo
Zions








* indicates the U.S. subsidiary of a non-U.S. bank. Inclusion on this list is based on U.S. assets only, and is current as of March 31, 2017.












v
t
e


Atlanta companies






Aaron's, Inc.
AGCO (Duluth)
American Megatrends (Gwinnett County)
Arby's (Sandy Springs)
AT&T Mobility
Atlanta Bread Company (Smyrna)
Atlanta Gas Light
BellSouth
Chick-fil-A (College Park)
Church's Chicken (Sandy Springs)
Coca-Cola
Cox Enterprises
Delta Air Lines
EarthLink
Equifax
ExpressJet (College Park)
Georgia Natural Gas
Georgia-Pacific
Georgia Power
Holiday Inn
Holiday Inn Express
The Home Depot (Cobb County)
Hooters
Intercontinental Exchange
Krystal
Kool Smiles (Marietta)
Merial (Duluth)
NCR Corporation (Gwinnett County)
Newell Brands
Popeyes (Sandy Springs)
RaceTrac
Rheem
Scientific Atlanta (Lawrenceville)
Simmons Bedding Company
Southern Company
SunTrust Banks
Turner Broadcasting System
United Parcel Service (Sandy Springs)
Waffle House (Gwinnett County)
The Weather Channel (Cobb County)










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=SunTrust_Banks&oldid=779392583"					
Categories: 1811 establishments in VirginiaBanks based in Georgia (U.S. state)Banks established in 1811Coca-ColaCompanies based in AtlantaCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeEconomy of Richmond, VirginiaEconomy of the Southeastern United StatesHidden categories: CS1 errors: datesWikipedia indefinitely semi-protected pagesPages using deprecated image syntaxPages using infobox company with unsupported parametersAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from August 2009 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschفارسیFrançaisItalianoNorsk bokmålPortuguêsРусский 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 8 May 2017, at 17:07.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









SunTrust Banks - Wikipedia




















 







SunTrust Banks

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


SunTrust Banks, Inc.





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: STI
S&P 500 Component


Industry
Banking


Founded
1985; 32 years ago (1985)


Headquarters
SunTrust Plaza
Atlanta, Georgia, U.S.



Number of locations

1,400 branches
2,160 ATMs[1]



Area served

Southeastern United States



Key people

William H. Rogers, Jr.
Chairman and CEO


Products
Financial Services


Revenue
 US$8.2 billion (FY 2013)[2]



Net income

 US$1.34 billion (FY 2013)[2]


Total assets
 US$204.875 billion (2016)[3]


Total equity
 US$21.4 billion (FY 2013)[4]



Number of employees

24,000 (09/01/2016)


Website
SunTrust.com






SunTrust locations in the United States.


SunTrust Banks, Inc., is an American bank holding company. The largest subsidiary is SunTrust Bank. It had US$175 billion in assets as of December 31, 2013.[5] SunTrust Bank's most direct corporate parent was established in 1891 in Atlanta, where its headquarters remain.
As of September 2016, SunTrust Bank operates 1,400 bank branches and 2,160 ATMs across 11 southeastern states and Washington, D.C..[1] The bank's primary businesses include deposits, lending, credit cards, and trust and investment services. Through its various subsidiaries, the company provides corporate and investment banking, capital market services, mortgage banking, and wealth management. It has nearly 24,000 employees.



Contents


1 History

1.1 Trust Company of Georgia
1.2 Sun Bank
1.3 Transformational merger


2 Current operations and structure

2.1 Executives


3 Relationship with Coca-Cola
4 2014 National Mortgage Settlement
5 Controversies
6 Buildings and branches
7 References
8 External links



History
Trust Company of Georgia
On 21 September 1891, SunTrust's most direct corporate ancestor, the Trust Company of Georgia, was granted a charter by the Georgia General Assembly as the Commercial Travelers' Savings Bank.[6] The founders were John M. Green, Joel Hurt, H. L. Atwater, W. A. Hansell, T. J. Hightower, J. G. Oglesby, J. D. Turner, John B. Daniel, Joseph Hirsch, Leon Lieberman, Louis Wellhouse, A. J. McBride, D. O. Dougherty, W. A. Gregg, W. W. Draper, A. C. Hook, W. T. Ashford, George W. Brooke, C. I. Branan, and C. D. Montgomery.[7]
In November 1893, it restructured as a trust company and renamed itself Trust Company of Georgia.[7][8]
Sun Bank
The earliest predecessor of Sun Bank was founded in 1911 as The People's National Bank. In 1920, it became the First National Bank. During the Great Depression, the First National Bank and Trust Company failed in the early 1930s. It was reorganized on Valentine’s Day 1934 as the First National Bank at Orlando.[6] In 1973, the bank merged with other Orlando banks to become Sun Banks.[9] It had three bank-related subsidiaries and total assets of $1.713 billion as of December 31, 1973.[10]
In the early 1980s, Sun went on a buying spree that raised at least some eyebrows, as it positioned the bank for the state of Florida to eventually allow interstate banking. It rolled up 81-year-old Hillsboro Bank, based in Plant City, an institution with $150 million in assets and then the third-oldest state-chartered bank. It also bought Florida State Bank of Tallahassee, which had tried to merge with Sun in 1973, but the deal fell apart when the economy soured.[11]
Then, in May 1983, Sun announced a deal for Miami-based Flagship Bank Inc., with $3.3 billion in assets, that catapulted Sun to be one of the Florida's largest bank holding companies. The Flagship deal was the seventh struck by Sun in less than a year.[11]
Transformational merger
The current SunTrust Banks, Inc., was the result of a merger between the Trust Company of Georgia and SunBanks, Inc., of Orlando, Florida in 1985. The merged company operated as Trust Company Bank in Georgia and Sun Bank in Florida until 1995, when all banks took the SunTrust name.
In 1986, shortly after the Trust Company–SunBanks merger, SunTrust purchased Third National Corporation of Nashville, though it continued to use the Third National name in Tennessee until 1995. SunTrust purchased Crestar Financial Corporation of Richmond, Virginia in 1998 expanding the company’s footprint into Virginia, Maryland, and the District of Columbia. Crestar's (and SunTrust's) earliest predecessor, Farmers Bank of Alexandria, was founded in 1811.[12]
In 1988, Suntrust is added to the S&P 500 Stock Price Index.[12]
In 2001, SunTrust purchased the institutional businesses of the Robinson-Humphrey Company, LLC. creating SunTrust Robinson-Humphrey.
The company bought Memphis-based National Commerce Financial Corporation (NCF) for $7 billion in 2004. The bank operated as National Bank of Commerce in South Carolina, Tennessee, Mississippi, Arkansas, Alabama, Georgia, Virginia, and West Virginia and as Central Carolina Bank and Trust in North Carolina. This acquisition allowed SunTrust to enter Alabama, the Carolinas, and West Virginia for the first time, and substantially increased its footprint in the other states.[13]
In 2013, the bank led a bank group that included Fifth Third Bank and Florida Community Bank that helped finance the acquirement of BEL USA, the parent company that owns DiscountMugs, by Comvest Partners, a private equity firm.[14][15][16]
In 2014, SunTrust announced it would launch a medical specialty group to work with independent medical practices.[17]
On Sept. 16, 2014, the Atlanta Braves announced the name of their new Cobb County stadium: SunTrust Park.[18] SunTrust Park, which is expected to be unveiled in time for the first pitch of the 2017 season, will serve as the new home of the Atlanta Braves. The $1.1 billion construction project in Cobb County will include restaurants, shops, offices, a hotel, and residential spaces directly connected to the park. The Braves organization is making history by building out the development at the same time the stadium is being constructed.[19]
Current operations and structure
The company operates three primary business units: Consumer Banking & Private Wealth Management, Wholesale Banking, and Mortgage.[20]

Business Mix, as of June 30, 2016[20]

Business Line
Percentage of Revenue


Consumer Banking
32%


Corporate & Investment Banking
20%


Commercial & Business Banking
14%


Private Wealth Management
12%


Mortgage
11%


Consumer Lending
8%


Commercial Real Estate
3%


As of September 2016, SunTrust Bank operates 1,400 bank branches and 2,160 ATMs across including Alabama, Arkansas, Florida, Georgia, Maryland, Mississippi, North Carolina, South Carolina, Tennessee, Virginia, West Virginia, and Washington, D.C.[1]
Executives


Individual (Position)
Years


William H. Rogers, Jr. (Chairman, President and CEO)
2011 – Present


James M. Wells, III (Chairman, President and CEO)
2007 – 2011


L. Phillip Humann (Chairman, President and CEO)
1998 – 2007


James B. “Jimmy” Williams (Chairman, President and CEO)
1990 – 1998


Robert M. Strickland (Chairman/SunTrust; president of Trust Company in 1973)
1978 – 1990


On April 21, 2011, William H. Rogers, Jr. began a transition into the CEO role previously held by Jim Wells, who retired December 31, 2011. Formerly SunTrust's COO, Rogers assumed the title of CEO on June 1, 2011. Rogers had been named President in 2008.[21] At that time, the current Chief Financial Officer (CFO) is Aleem Gillani was named in April 2011.[22]
In 2015 and 2016, two corporate treasurers have gone on to become CFOs at large regional banks, including Kevin Blair at Zions Bancorporation and Paul Burdiss at Synovus,[23][24] and a unit strategy head, Inder M. Singh, became CFO at IT firm Unisys.[25]
Relationship with Coca-Cola
SunTrust had a long-standing relationship with The Coca-Cola Company. In 1919, Ernest Woodruff, president of the Trust Company from 1904 to 1922, and W. C. Bradley bought The Coca-Cola Company for $25 million and restructured. The Trust Company of Georgia helped underwrite the initial public offering, accepting shares of Coke in exchange for its services.[8] Four years later, his son, Robert W. Woodruff, was elected Coca-Cola's president, a title he would hold until 1954 and was a board member until 1984.
As a result, SunTrust owned 48.3 million shares (3.58%) of Coke as of 2006, which had a GAAP cost basis of $110,000. In addition, the original copy of the formula for Coca-Cola was stored in a safe deposit box of an eventual SunTrust location in Atlanta (originally a Trust Company Bank location) from 1925 to 2011.[26] It was eventually moved to a purpose built vault in the World of Coca-Cola, also in Atlanta.[27]
Over the years, Coca-Cola executives would sit on SunTrust's board of directors[28] and SunTrust execs would sit on Coca-Cola's board.[29]
SunTrust started to divest Coke shares in May 2007, when it sold 4.5 million, or 9% of its position.[30] In 2008, the bank sold another 10 million shares, donated 3.6 million to SunTrust's charitable foundation, and crafted a plan to sell more shares in 2014 and 2015.[31]
However, in September 2012, SunTrust sold all of its Coke shares at the behest of its primary regulator, the Federal Reserve.[32] SunTrust was forced to resubmit its capital plan – known as Comprehensive Capital Analysis and Review (CCAR) – after it failed part of the stress test in March 2012. The Coke shares (or any stock holding) held by SunTrust would weigh on the bank's capital ratio under new capital rules within Basel III. Thus, SunTrust decided to accelerate its plan and sold the Coke shares earlier than expected.[33]
2014 National Mortgage Settlement
In 2014, the Federal government together with state attorneys general in 49 states and the District of Columbia reached a settlement requiring SunTrust Mortgage, Inc., to provide $500 million in various forms of relief to mortgage borrowers. The United States District Court for the District of Columbia entered the Consent Order on September 30, 2014. The consent order addressed SunTrust's alleged misconduct regarding its mortgage servicing and foreclosure practices. SunTrust was also required to create a 40 million dollar fund for the approximately 45,000 SunTrust borrowers who were foreclosed upon between January 1, 2008 and December 31, 2013. In addition, SunTrust was required to adhere to significant new homeowner protections. The consent order required that SunTrust follow the servicing standards set up by the 2012 National Mortgage Settlement (NMS) with the five largest banks.
Controversies
In September 2015 SunTrust laid off one hundred IT professionals with a controversial severance agreement clause by SunTrust that required laid-off employees to be available to help without pay for a period of two years. On October, 23rd Suntrust reversed course and removed the clause: "to make myself reasonably available to SunTrust regarding matters in which I have been involved in the course of my employment with SunTrust and/or about which I have knowledge as a result of my employment with SunTrust."[34]
Buildings and branches
Located at 200 South Orange Avenue, The SunTrust Center is the tallest building in downtown Orlando, Florida. The 35 story, 650,000 sq ft (60,000 m2) building was constructed in 1988 at a cost of approximately $100 million.[citation needed] It is constructed of reinforced concrete and granite with marble finishes and features 17 elevators.







SunTrust Plaza in Atlanta, Georgia









Suntrust Bank in Gaithersburg, Maryland









SunTrust Building in Washington, D.C.









SunTrust Tower in Jacksonville, Florida









SunTrust Center in Orlando, Florida









SunTrust building in Tampa, Florida









SunTrust branch in Durham, North Carolina









SunTrust Bank in Hendersonville, Tennessee




References


^ a b c "SunTrust Corporate Profile". SunTrust.com. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ a b SunTrust Banks (STI) annual SEC income statement filing via Wikinvest
^ https://www.nyse.com/quote/XNYS:STI
^ SunTrust Banks (STI) annual SEC balance sheet filing via Wikinvest
^ "FDIC Institution Directory: SunTrust Bank". 
^ a b "Historical Highlight". SunTrust.com. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ a b Garrett, Franklin M. (1969). Atlanta and environs : A Chronicle of Its People and Events, 1880s-1930s. Athens, Ga.: University of Georgia Press. p. 235. ISBN 0-8203-0264-3. 
^ a b Borowsky, Bruce (2005-03-11). "SunTrust Banks (Trust Company Bank)". New Georgia Encyclopedia. Georgia Humanities Council. Retrieved 2006-12-10. 
^ "Orlando City Planning" (PDF). CityofOrlando.net. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ "Sun Bank Earnings Reported". Lakeland Ledger. February 12, 1975. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ a b Stuart, Reginald (May 16, 1983). "FLORIDA'S BANK-MERGER SPREE". New York Times. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ a b https://www.suntrust.com/docs/pdf/newsroom/history_highlights.pdf
^ "SunTrust to buy National Commerce Financial". Atlanta Business Chronicle. 2004-05-09. p. 1. Retrieved 2007-04-08. 
^ "Comvest Invests in BEL USA, Adds On Branders.com". PitchBook. 17 March 2014. Retrieved 30 December 2014. 
^ Dunford, Thomas (24 December 2013). "The Morning Leverage: What’s Waiting in Private Equity’s Stocking?". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 30 December 2014. 
^ "Comvest Investment Partners IV, L.P.; Amin Rahman Ramjee". Federal Trade Commission. 20 December 2013. Retrieved 30 December 2014. 
^ Correia, Margarida. "SunTrust Private Wealth Management Launches Medical Specialty Group". Bank Investment Consultant. Retrieved 27 June 2014. 
^ Tucker, Tim (16 September 2014). "Braves name their new stadium: SunTrust Park". ajc.com. Retrieved 26 May 2015. 
^ Riley, Cindy (13 May 2015). "SunTrust Park to House Atlanta Braves in 2017". constructionequipmentguide.com. Retrieved 26 May 2015. 
^ a b "Barclays Global Presentation" (PDF). SunTrust.com. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ Bizjournals
^ "Aleem Gillani". Suntrust.com. Retrieved 30 September 2016. 
^ Adams, Tony (July 11, 2016). "Synovus taps SunTrust executive for chief financial officer". ledger-enquirer.com. Retrieved 30 September 2016. 
^ Nemeroff, Evan (March 20, 2015). "Zions Taps SunTrust Treasurer to Replace Retiring Chief Financial Officer". American Banker. Retrieved 30 September 2016. 
^ "Chief Financial Officer (CFO) Janet Haugen to Retire from Unisys; Company Names Inder M. Singh to Succeed Haugen as CFO". Retrieved 30 September 2016. 
^ Coporate. "Coca-Cola Moves Its Secret Formula to The World of Coca-Cola". Coca-Cola Journey. Coca-Cola Company. Retrieved 28 June 2016. 
^ Stafford, Leon. "Coke hides its secret formula in plain sight in World of Coca-Cola move". The Atlanta Journal-Constitution. The Atlanta Journal-Constitution. Retrieved 28 June 2016. 
^ "Officers & Directors". SunTrust Banks, Inc. Retrieved 2007-04-08. 
^ "Board Of Directors". The Coca-Cola Company. Retrieved 2007-04-08. 
^ "SunTrust Selling Coke". USAToday.com. May 15, 2007. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ Gross, Daniel (7/23/08). "DESPERATE BANKS SELLING OFF HARD ASSETS". Newsweek. Retrieved 23 September 2016.  Check date values in: |date= (help)
^ MATTHIAS RIEKER and SAABIRA CHAUDHURI (October 22, 2012). "SunTrust Profit Soars on Coke Stock Sale". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ Benoit, David (September 6, 2012). "SunTrust Sells Coke Shares and Bad Loans". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ http://www.computerworld.com/article/2996527/it-outsourcing/in-turnabout-suntrust-removes-contentious-severance-clause.html


External links

SunTrust Banks, Inc. - official site



Business data for SunTrust Banks: Google Finance
Yahoo! Finance
Reuters
SEC filings



Yahoo! - SunTrust Banks, Inc. Company Profile







v
t
e


50 largest banks and bank holding companies in the United States






Ally
American Express
Bank of America
Bank of New York Mellon
Barclays*
BB&T
BBVA*
BMO*
BNP Paribas*
Capital One
Charles Schwab
CIT
Citigroup
Citizens
Comerica
Credit Suisse*
Deutsche Bank*
Discover
E-Trade
Fifth Third
Goldman Sachs
HSBC*
Huntington
JPMorgan Chase
KeyBank
M&T
Mizuho*
Morgan Stanley
MUFG Union Bank*
Mutual of Omaha
New York Community
Northern Trust
People's United
PNC
Popular
Royal Bank of Canada*
Regions
Banco Santander*
State Farm
State Street
SunTrust
SVB
Synchrony
Toronto Dominion*
TIAA
U.S. Bancorp
UBS*
USAA
Wells Fargo
Zions








* indicates the U.S. subsidiary of a non-U.S. bank. Inclusion on this list is based on U.S. assets only, and is current as of March 31, 2017.












v
t
e


Atlanta companies






Aaron's, Inc.
AGCO (Duluth)
American Megatrends (Gwinnett County)
Arby's (Sandy Springs)
AT&T Mobility
Atlanta Bread Company (Smyrna)
Atlanta Gas Light
BellSouth
Chick-fil-A (College Park)
Church's Chicken (Sandy Springs)
Coca-Cola
Cox Enterprises
Delta Air Lines
EarthLink
Equifax
ExpressJet (College Park)
Georgia Natural Gas
Georgia-Pacific
Georgia Power
Holiday Inn
Holiday Inn Express
The Home Depot (Cobb County)
Hooters
Intercontinental Exchange
Krystal
Kool Smiles (Marietta)
Merial (Duluth)
NCR Corporation (Gwinnett County)
Newell Brands
Popeyes (Sandy Springs)
RaceTrac
Rheem
Scientific Atlanta (Lawrenceville)
Simmons Bedding Company
Southern Company
SunTrust Banks
Turner Broadcasting System
United Parcel Service (Sandy Springs)
Waffle House (Gwinnett County)
The Weather Channel (Cobb County)










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=SunTrust_Banks&oldid=779392583"					
Categories: 1811 establishments in VirginiaBanks based in Georgia (U.S. state)Banks established in 1811Coca-ColaCompanies based in AtlantaCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeEconomy of Richmond, VirginiaEconomy of the Southeastern United StatesHidden categories: CS1 errors: datesWikipedia indefinitely semi-protected pagesPages using deprecated image syntaxPages using infobox company with unsupported parametersAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from August 2009 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschفارسیFrançaisItalianoNorsk bokmålPortuguêsРусский 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 8 May 2017, at 17:07.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









SunTrust Banks - Wikipedia




















 







SunTrust Banks

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


SunTrust Banks, Inc.





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: STI
S&P 500 Component


Industry
Banking


Founded
1985; 32 years ago (1985)


Headquarters
SunTrust Plaza
Atlanta, Georgia, U.S.



Number of locations

1,400 branches
2,160 ATMs[1]



Area served

Southeastern United States



Key people

William H. Rogers, Jr.
Chairman and CEO


Products
Financial Services


Revenue
 US$8.2 billion (FY 2013)[2]



Net income

 US$1.34 billion (FY 2013)[2]


Total assets
 US$204.875 billion (2016)[3]


Total equity
 US$21.4 billion (FY 2013)[4]



Number of employees

24,000 (09/01/2016)


Website
SunTrust.com






SunTrust locations in the United States.


SunTrust Banks, Inc., is an American bank holding company. The largest subsidiary is SunTrust Bank. It had US$175 billion in assets as of December 31, 2013.[5] SunTrust Bank's most direct corporate parent was established in 1891 in Atlanta, where its headquarters remain.
As of September 2016, SunTrust Bank operates 1,400 bank branches and 2,160 ATMs across 11 southeastern states and Washington, D.C..[1] The bank's primary businesses include deposits, lending, credit cards, and trust and investment services. Through its various subsidiaries, the company provides corporate and investment banking, capital market services, mortgage banking, and wealth management. It has nearly 24,000 employees.



Contents


1 History

1.1 Trust Company of Georgia
1.2 Sun Bank
1.3 Transformational merger


2 Current operations and structure

2.1 Executives


3 Relationship with Coca-Cola
4 2014 National Mortgage Settlement
5 Controversies
6 Buildings and branches
7 References
8 External links



History
Trust Company of Georgia
On 21 September 1891, SunTrust's most direct corporate ancestor, the Trust Company of Georgia, was granted a charter by the Georgia General Assembly as the Commercial Travelers' Savings Bank.[6] The founders were John M. Green, Joel Hurt, H. L. Atwater, W. A. Hansell, T. J. Hightower, J. G. Oglesby, J. D. Turner, John B. Daniel, Joseph Hirsch, Leon Lieberman, Louis Wellhouse, A. J. McBride, D. O. Dougherty, W. A. Gregg, W. W. Draper, A. C. Hook, W. T. Ashford, George W. Brooke, C. I. Branan, and C. D. Montgomery.[7]
In November 1893, it restructured as a trust company and renamed itself Trust Company of Georgia.[7][8]
Sun Bank
The earliest predecessor of Sun Bank was founded in 1911 as The People's National Bank. In 1920, it became the First National Bank. During the Great Depression, the First National Bank and Trust Company failed in the early 1930s. It was reorganized on Valentine’s Day 1934 as the First National Bank at Orlando.[6] In 1973, the bank merged with other Orlando banks to become Sun Banks.[9] It had three bank-related subsidiaries and total assets of $1.713 billion as of December 31, 1973.[10]
In the early 1980s, Sun went on a buying spree that raised at least some eyebrows, as it positioned the bank for the state of Florida to eventually allow interstate banking. It rolled up 81-year-old Hillsboro Bank, based in Plant City, an institution with $150 million in assets and then the third-oldest state-chartered bank. It also bought Florida State Bank of Tallahassee, which had tried to merge with Sun in 1973, but the deal fell apart when the economy soured.[11]
Then, in May 1983, Sun announced a deal for Miami-based Flagship Bank Inc., with $3.3 billion in assets, that catapulted Sun to be one of the Florida's largest bank holding companies. The Flagship deal was the seventh struck by Sun in less than a year.[11]
Transformational merger
The current SunTrust Banks, Inc., was the result of a merger between the Trust Company of Georgia and SunBanks, Inc., of Orlando, Florida in 1985. The merged company operated as Trust Company Bank in Georgia and Sun Bank in Florida until 1995, when all banks took the SunTrust name.
In 1986, shortly after the Trust Company–SunBanks merger, SunTrust purchased Third National Corporation of Nashville, though it continued to use the Third National name in Tennessee until 1995. SunTrust purchased Crestar Financial Corporation of Richmond, Virginia in 1998 expanding the company’s footprint into Virginia, Maryland, and the District of Columbia. Crestar's (and SunTrust's) earliest predecessor, Farmers Bank of Alexandria, was founded in 1811.[12]
In 1988, Suntrust is added to the S&P 500 Stock Price Index.[12]
In 2001, SunTrust purchased the institutional businesses of the Robinson-Humphrey Company, LLC. creating SunTrust Robinson-Humphrey.
The company bought Memphis-based National Commerce Financial Corporation (NCF) for $7 billion in 2004. The bank operated as National Bank of Commerce in South Carolina, Tennessee, Mississippi, Arkansas, Alabama, Georgia, Virginia, and West Virginia and as Central Carolina Bank and Trust in North Carolina. This acquisition allowed SunTrust to enter Alabama, the Carolinas, and West Virginia for the first time, and substantially increased its footprint in the other states.[13]
In 2013, the bank led a bank group that included Fifth Third Bank and Florida Community Bank that helped finance the acquirement of BEL USA, the parent company that owns DiscountMugs, by Comvest Partners, a private equity firm.[14][15][16]
In 2014, SunTrust announced it would launch a medical specialty group to work with independent medical practices.[17]
On Sept. 16, 2014, the Atlanta Braves announced the name of their new Cobb County stadium: SunTrust Park.[18] SunTrust Park, which is expected to be unveiled in time for the first pitch of the 2017 season, will serve as the new home of the Atlanta Braves. The $1.1 billion construction project in Cobb County will include restaurants, shops, offices, a hotel, and residential spaces directly connected to the park. The Braves organization is making history by building out the development at the same time the stadium is being constructed.[19]
Current operations and structure
The company operates three primary business units: Consumer Banking & Private Wealth Management, Wholesale Banking, and Mortgage.[20]

Business Mix, as of June 30, 2016[20]

Business Line
Percentage of Revenue


Consumer Banking
32%


Corporate & Investment Banking
20%


Commercial & Business Banking
14%


Private Wealth Management
12%


Mortgage
11%


Consumer Lending
8%


Commercial Real Estate
3%


As of September 2016, SunTrust Bank operates 1,400 bank branches and 2,160 ATMs across including Alabama, Arkansas, Florida, Georgia, Maryland, Mississippi, North Carolina, South Carolina, Tennessee, Virginia, West Virginia, and Washington, D.C.[1]
Executives


Individual (Position)
Years


William H. Rogers, Jr. (Chairman, President and CEO)
2011 – Present


James M. Wells, III (Chairman, President and CEO)
2007 – 2011


L. Phillip Humann (Chairman, President and CEO)
1998 – 2007


James B. “Jimmy” Williams (Chairman, President and CEO)
1990 – 1998


Robert M. Strickland (Chairman/SunTrust; president of Trust Company in 1973)
1978 – 1990


On April 21, 2011, William H. Rogers, Jr. began a transition into the CEO role previously held by Jim Wells, who retired December 31, 2011. Formerly SunTrust's COO, Rogers assumed the title of CEO on June 1, 2011. Rogers had been named President in 2008.[21] At that time, the current Chief Financial Officer (CFO) is Aleem Gillani was named in April 2011.[22]
In 2015 and 2016, two corporate treasurers have gone on to become CFOs at large regional banks, including Kevin Blair at Zions Bancorporation and Paul Burdiss at Synovus,[23][24] and a unit strategy head, Inder M. Singh, became CFO at IT firm Unisys.[25]
Relationship with Coca-Cola
SunTrust had a long-standing relationship with The Coca-Cola Company. In 1919, Ernest Woodruff, president of the Trust Company from 1904 to 1922, and W. C. Bradley bought The Coca-Cola Company for $25 million and restructured. The Trust Company of Georgia helped underwrite the initial public offering, accepting shares of Coke in exchange for its services.[8] Four years later, his son, Robert W. Woodruff, was elected Coca-Cola's president, a title he would hold until 1954 and was a board member until 1984.
As a result, SunTrust owned 48.3 million shares (3.58%) of Coke as of 2006, which had a GAAP cost basis of $110,000. In addition, the original copy of the formula for Coca-Cola was stored in a safe deposit box of an eventual SunTrust location in Atlanta (originally a Trust Company Bank location) from 1925 to 2011.[26] It was eventually moved to a purpose built vault in the World of Coca-Cola, also in Atlanta.[27]
Over the years, Coca-Cola executives would sit on SunTrust's board of directors[28] and SunTrust execs would sit on Coca-Cola's board.[29]
SunTrust started to divest Coke shares in May 2007, when it sold 4.5 million, or 9% of its position.[30] In 2008, the bank sold another 10 million shares, donated 3.6 million to SunTrust's charitable foundation, and crafted a plan to sell more shares in 2014 and 2015.[31]
However, in September 2012, SunTrust sold all of its Coke shares at the behest of its primary regulator, the Federal Reserve.[32] SunTrust was forced to resubmit its capital plan – known as Comprehensive Capital Analysis and Review (CCAR) – after it failed part of the stress test in March 2012. The Coke shares (or any stock holding) held by SunTrust would weigh on the bank's capital ratio under new capital rules within Basel III. Thus, SunTrust decided to accelerate its plan and sold the Coke shares earlier than expected.[33]
2014 National Mortgage Settlement
In 2014, the Federal government together with state attorneys general in 49 states and the District of Columbia reached a settlement requiring SunTrust Mortgage, Inc., to provide $500 million in various forms of relief to mortgage borrowers. The United States District Court for the District of Columbia entered the Consent Order on September 30, 2014. The consent order addressed SunTrust's alleged misconduct regarding its mortgage servicing and foreclosure practices. SunTrust was also required to create a 40 million dollar fund for the approximately 45,000 SunTrust borrowers who were foreclosed upon between January 1, 2008 and December 31, 2013. In addition, SunTrust was required to adhere to significant new homeowner protections. The consent order required that SunTrust follow the servicing standards set up by the 2012 National Mortgage Settlement (NMS) with the five largest banks.
Controversies
In September 2015 SunTrust laid off one hundred IT professionals with a controversial severance agreement clause by SunTrust that required laid-off employees to be available to help without pay for a period of two years. On October, 23rd Suntrust reversed course and removed the clause: "to make myself reasonably available to SunTrust regarding matters in which I have been involved in the course of my employment with SunTrust and/or about which I have knowledge as a result of my employment with SunTrust."[34]
Buildings and branches
Located at 200 South Orange Avenue, The SunTrust Center is the tallest building in downtown Orlando, Florida. The 35 story, 650,000 sq ft (60,000 m2) building was constructed in 1988 at a cost of approximately $100 million.[citation needed] It is constructed of reinforced concrete and granite with marble finishes and features 17 elevators.







SunTrust Plaza in Atlanta, Georgia









Suntrust Bank in Gaithersburg, Maryland









SunTrust Building in Washington, D.C.









SunTrust Tower in Jacksonville, Florida









SunTrust Center in Orlando, Florida









SunTrust building in Tampa, Florida









SunTrust branch in Durham, North Carolina









SunTrust Bank in Hendersonville, Tennessee




References


^ a b c "SunTrust Corporate Profile". SunTrust.com. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ a b SunTrust Banks (STI) annual SEC income statement filing via Wikinvest
^ https://www.nyse.com/quote/XNYS:STI
^ SunTrust Banks (STI) annual SEC balance sheet filing via Wikinvest
^ "FDIC Institution Directory: SunTrust Bank". 
^ a b "Historical Highlight". SunTrust.com. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ a b Garrett, Franklin M. (1969). Atlanta and environs : A Chronicle of Its People and Events, 1880s-1930s. Athens, Ga.: University of Georgia Press. p. 235. ISBN 0-8203-0264-3. 
^ a b Borowsky, Bruce (2005-03-11). "SunTrust Banks (Trust Company Bank)". New Georgia Encyclopedia. Georgia Humanities Council. Retrieved 2006-12-10. 
^ "Orlando City Planning" (PDF). CityofOrlando.net. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ "Sun Bank Earnings Reported". Lakeland Ledger. February 12, 1975. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ a b Stuart, Reginald (May 16, 1983). "FLORIDA'S BANK-MERGER SPREE". New York Times. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ a b https://www.suntrust.com/docs/pdf/newsroom/history_highlights.pdf
^ "SunTrust to buy National Commerce Financial". Atlanta Business Chronicle. 2004-05-09. p. 1. Retrieved 2007-04-08. 
^ "Comvest Invests in BEL USA, Adds On Branders.com". PitchBook. 17 March 2014. Retrieved 30 December 2014. 
^ Dunford, Thomas (24 December 2013). "The Morning Leverage: What’s Waiting in Private Equity’s Stocking?". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 30 December 2014. 
^ "Comvest Investment Partners IV, L.P.; Amin Rahman Ramjee". Federal Trade Commission. 20 December 2013. Retrieved 30 December 2014. 
^ Correia, Margarida. "SunTrust Private Wealth Management Launches Medical Specialty Group". Bank Investment Consultant. Retrieved 27 June 2014. 
^ Tucker, Tim (16 September 2014). "Braves name their new stadium: SunTrust Park". ajc.com. Retrieved 26 May 2015. 
^ Riley, Cindy (13 May 2015). "SunTrust Park to House Atlanta Braves in 2017". constructionequipmentguide.com. Retrieved 26 May 2015. 
^ a b "Barclays Global Presentation" (PDF). SunTrust.com. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ Bizjournals
^ "Aleem Gillani". Suntrust.com. Retrieved 30 September 2016. 
^ Adams, Tony (July 11, 2016). "Synovus taps SunTrust executive for chief financial officer". ledger-enquirer.com. Retrieved 30 September 2016. 
^ Nemeroff, Evan (March 20, 2015). "Zions Taps SunTrust Treasurer to Replace Retiring Chief Financial Officer". American Banker. Retrieved 30 September 2016. 
^ "Chief Financial Officer (CFO) Janet Haugen to Retire from Unisys; Company Names Inder M. Singh to Succeed Haugen as CFO". Retrieved 30 September 2016. 
^ Coporate. "Coca-Cola Moves Its Secret Formula to The World of Coca-Cola". Coca-Cola Journey. Coca-Cola Company. Retrieved 28 June 2016. 
^ Stafford, Leon. "Coke hides its secret formula in plain sight in World of Coca-Cola move". The Atlanta Journal-Constitution. The Atlanta Journal-Constitution. Retrieved 28 June 2016. 
^ "Officers & Directors". SunTrust Banks, Inc. Retrieved 2007-04-08. 
^ "Board Of Directors". The Coca-Cola Company. Retrieved 2007-04-08. 
^ "SunTrust Selling Coke". USAToday.com. May 15, 2007. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ Gross, Daniel (7/23/08). "DESPERATE BANKS SELLING OFF HARD ASSETS". Newsweek. Retrieved 23 September 2016.  Check date values in: |date= (help)
^ MATTHIAS RIEKER and SAABIRA CHAUDHURI (October 22, 2012). "SunTrust Profit Soars on Coke Stock Sale". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ Benoit, David (September 6, 2012). "SunTrust Sells Coke Shares and Bad Loans". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ http://www.computerworld.com/article/2996527/it-outsourcing/in-turnabout-suntrust-removes-contentious-severance-clause.html


External links

SunTrust Banks, Inc. - official site



Business data for SunTrust Banks: Google Finance
Yahoo! Finance
Reuters
SEC filings



Yahoo! - SunTrust Banks, Inc. Company Profile







v
t
e


50 largest banks and bank holding companies in the United States






Ally
American Express
Bank of America
Bank of New York Mellon
Barclays*
BB&T
BBVA*
BMO*
BNP Paribas*
Capital One
Charles Schwab
CIT
Citigroup
Citizens
Comerica
Credit Suisse*
Deutsche Bank*
Discover
E-Trade
Fifth Third
Goldman Sachs
HSBC*
Huntington
JPMorgan Chase
KeyBank
M&T
Mizuho*
Morgan Stanley
MUFG Union Bank*
Mutual of Omaha
New York Community
Northern Trust
People's United
PNC
Popular
Royal Bank of Canada*
Regions
Banco Santander*
State Farm
State Street
SunTrust
SVB
Synchrony
Toronto Dominion*
TIAA
U.S. Bancorp
UBS*
USAA
Wells Fargo
Zions








* indicates the U.S. subsidiary of a non-U.S. bank. Inclusion on this list is based on U.S. assets only, and is current as of March 31, 2017.












v
t
e


Atlanta companies






Aaron's, Inc.
AGCO (Duluth)
American Megatrends (Gwinnett County)
Arby's (Sandy Springs)
AT&T Mobility
Atlanta Bread Company (Smyrna)
Atlanta Gas Light
BellSouth
Chick-fil-A (College Park)
Church's Chicken (Sandy Springs)
Coca-Cola
Cox Enterprises
Delta Air Lines
EarthLink
Equifax
ExpressJet (College Park)
Georgia Natural Gas
Georgia-Pacific
Georgia Power
Holiday Inn
Holiday Inn Express
The Home Depot (Cobb County)
Hooters
Intercontinental Exchange
Krystal
Kool Smiles (Marietta)
Merial (Duluth)
NCR Corporation (Gwinnett County)
Newell Brands
Popeyes (Sandy Springs)
RaceTrac
Rheem
Scientific Atlanta (Lawrenceville)
Simmons Bedding Company
Southern Company
SunTrust Banks
Turner Broadcasting System
United Parcel Service (Sandy Springs)
Waffle House (Gwinnett County)
The Weather Channel (Cobb County)










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=SunTrust_Banks&oldid=779392583"					
Categories: 1811 establishments in VirginiaBanks based in Georgia (U.S. state)Banks established in 1811Coca-ColaCompanies based in AtlantaCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeEconomy of Richmond, VirginiaEconomy of the Southeastern United StatesHidden categories: CS1 errors: datesWikipedia indefinitely semi-protected pagesPages using deprecated image syntaxPages using infobox company with unsupported parametersAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from August 2009 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschفارسیFrançaisItalianoNorsk bokmålPortuguêsРусский 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 8 May 2017, at 17:07.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









SunTrust Banks - Wikipedia




















 







SunTrust Banks

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


SunTrust Banks, Inc.





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: STI
S&P 500 Component


Industry
Banking


Founded
1985; 32 years ago (1985)


Headquarters
SunTrust Plaza
Atlanta, Georgia, U.S.



Number of locations

1,400 branches
2,160 ATMs[1]



Area served

Southeastern United States



Key people

William H. Rogers, Jr.
Chairman and CEO


Products
Financial Services


Revenue
 US$8.2 billion (FY 2013)[2]



Net income

 US$1.34 billion (FY 2013)[2]


Total assets
 US$204.875 billion (2016)[3]


Total equity
 US$21.4 billion (FY 2013)[4]



Number of employees

24,000 (09/01/2016)


Website
SunTrust.com






SunTrust locations in the United States.


SunTrust Banks, Inc., is an American bank holding company. The largest subsidiary is SunTrust Bank. It had US$175 billion in assets as of December 31, 2013.[5] SunTrust Bank's most direct corporate parent was established in 1891 in Atlanta, where its headquarters remain.
As of September 2016, SunTrust Bank operates 1,400 bank branches and 2,160 ATMs across 11 southeastern states and Washington, D.C..[1] The bank's primary businesses include deposits, lending, credit cards, and trust and investment services. Through its various subsidiaries, the company provides corporate and investment banking, capital market services, mortgage banking, and wealth management. It has nearly 24,000 employees.



Contents


1 History

1.1 Trust Company of Georgia
1.2 Sun Bank
1.3 Transformational merger


2 Current operations and structure

2.1 Executives


3 Relationship with Coca-Cola
4 2014 National Mortgage Settlement
5 Controversies
6 Buildings and branches
7 References
8 External links



History
Trust Company of Georgia
On 21 September 1891, SunTrust's most direct corporate ancestor, the Trust Company of Georgia, was granted a charter by the Georgia General Assembly as the Commercial Travelers' Savings Bank.[6] The founders were John M. Green, Joel Hurt, H. L. Atwater, W. A. Hansell, T. J. Hightower, J. G. Oglesby, J. D. Turner, John B. Daniel, Joseph Hirsch, Leon Lieberman, Louis Wellhouse, A. J. McBride, D. O. Dougherty, W. A. Gregg, W. W. Draper, A. C. Hook, W. T. Ashford, George W. Brooke, C. I. Branan, and C. D. Montgomery.[7]
In November 1893, it restructured as a trust company and renamed itself Trust Company of Georgia.[7][8]
Sun Bank
The earliest predecessor of Sun Bank was founded in 1911 as The People's National Bank. In 1920, it became the First National Bank. During the Great Depression, the First National Bank and Trust Company failed in the early 1930s. It was reorganized on Valentine’s Day 1934 as the First National Bank at Orlando.[6] In 1973, the bank merged with other Orlando banks to become Sun Banks.[9] It had three bank-related subsidiaries and total assets of $1.713 billion as of December 31, 1973.[10]
In the early 1980s, Sun went on a buying spree that raised at least some eyebrows, as it positioned the bank for the state of Florida to eventually allow interstate banking. It rolled up 81-year-old Hillsboro Bank, based in Plant City, an institution with $150 million in assets and then the third-oldest state-chartered bank. It also bought Florida State Bank of Tallahassee, which had tried to merge with Sun in 1973, but the deal fell apart when the economy soured.[11]
Then, in May 1983, Sun announced a deal for Miami-based Flagship Bank Inc., with $3.3 billion in assets, that catapulted Sun to be one of the Florida's largest bank holding companies. The Flagship deal was the seventh struck by Sun in less than a year.[11]
Transformational merger
The current SunTrust Banks, Inc., was the result of a merger between the Trust Company of Georgia and SunBanks, Inc., of Orlando, Florida in 1985. The merged company operated as Trust Company Bank in Georgia and Sun Bank in Florida until 1995, when all banks took the SunTrust name.
In 1986, shortly after the Trust Company–SunBanks merger, SunTrust purchased Third National Corporation of Nashville, though it continued to use the Third National name in Tennessee until 1995. SunTrust purchased Crestar Financial Corporation of Richmond, Virginia in 1998 expanding the company’s footprint into Virginia, Maryland, and the District of Columbia. Crestar's (and SunTrust's) earliest predecessor, Farmers Bank of Alexandria, was founded in 1811.[12]
In 1988, Suntrust is added to the S&P 500 Stock Price Index.[12]
In 2001, SunTrust purchased the institutional businesses of the Robinson-Humphrey Company, LLC. creating SunTrust Robinson-Humphrey.
The company bought Memphis-based National Commerce Financial Corporation (NCF) for $7 billion in 2004. The bank operated as National Bank of Commerce in South Carolina, Tennessee, Mississippi, Arkansas, Alabama, Georgia, Virginia, and West Virginia and as Central Carolina Bank and Trust in North Carolina. This acquisition allowed SunTrust to enter Alabama, the Carolinas, and West Virginia for the first time, and substantially increased its footprint in the other states.[13]
In 2013, the bank led a bank group that included Fifth Third Bank and Florida Community Bank that helped finance the acquirement of BEL USA, the parent company that owns DiscountMugs, by Comvest Partners, a private equity firm.[14][15][16]
In 2014, SunTrust announced it would launch a medical specialty group to work with independent medical practices.[17]
On Sept. 16, 2014, the Atlanta Braves announced the name of their new Cobb County stadium: SunTrust Park.[18] SunTrust Park, which is expected to be unveiled in time for the first pitch of the 2017 season, will serve as the new home of the Atlanta Braves. The $1.1 billion construction project in Cobb County will include restaurants, shops, offices, a hotel, and residential spaces directly connected to the park. The Braves organization is making history by building out the development at the same time the stadium is being constructed.[19]
Current operations and structure
The company operates three primary business units: Consumer Banking & Private Wealth Management, Wholesale Banking, and Mortgage.[20]

Business Mix, as of June 30, 2016[20]

Business Line
Percentage of Revenue


Consumer Banking
32%


Corporate & Investment Banking
20%


Commercial & Business Banking
14%


Private Wealth Management
12%


Mortgage
11%


Consumer Lending
8%


Commercial Real Estate
3%


As of September 2016, SunTrust Bank operates 1,400 bank branches and 2,160 ATMs across including Alabama, Arkansas, Florida, Georgia, Maryland, Mississippi, North Carolina, South Carolina, Tennessee, Virginia, West Virginia, and Washington, D.C.[1]
Executives


Individual (Position)
Years


William H. Rogers, Jr. (Chairman, President and CEO)
2011 – Present


James M. Wells, III (Chairman, President and CEO)
2007 – 2011


L. Phillip Humann (Chairman, President and CEO)
1998 – 2007


James B. “Jimmy” Williams (Chairman, President and CEO)
1990 – 1998


Robert M. Strickland (Chairman/SunTrust; president of Trust Company in 1973)
1978 – 1990


On April 21, 2011, William H. Rogers, Jr. began a transition into the CEO role previously held by Jim Wells, who retired December 31, 2011. Formerly SunTrust's COO, Rogers assumed the title of CEO on June 1, 2011. Rogers had been named President in 2008.[21] At that time, the current Chief Financial Officer (CFO) is Aleem Gillani was named in April 2011.[22]
In 2015 and 2016, two corporate treasurers have gone on to become CFOs at large regional banks, including Kevin Blair at Zions Bancorporation and Paul Burdiss at Synovus,[23][24] and a unit strategy head, Inder M. Singh, became CFO at IT firm Unisys.[25]
Relationship with Coca-Cola
SunTrust had a long-standing relationship with The Coca-Cola Company. In 1919, Ernest Woodruff, president of the Trust Company from 1904 to 1922, and W. C. Bradley bought The Coca-Cola Company for $25 million and restructured. The Trust Company of Georgia helped underwrite the initial public offering, accepting shares of Coke in exchange for its services.[8] Four years later, his son, Robert W. Woodruff, was elected Coca-Cola's president, a title he would hold until 1954 and was a board member until 1984.
As a result, SunTrust owned 48.3 million shares (3.58%) of Coke as of 2006, which had a GAAP cost basis of $110,000. In addition, the original copy of the formula for Coca-Cola was stored in a safe deposit box of an eventual SunTrust location in Atlanta (originally a Trust Company Bank location) from 1925 to 2011.[26] It was eventually moved to a purpose built vault in the World of Coca-Cola, also in Atlanta.[27]
Over the years, Coca-Cola executives would sit on SunTrust's board of directors[28] and SunTrust execs would sit on Coca-Cola's board.[29]
SunTrust started to divest Coke shares in May 2007, when it sold 4.5 million, or 9% of its position.[30] In 2008, the bank sold another 10 million shares, donated 3.6 million to SunTrust's charitable foundation, and crafted a plan to sell more shares in 2014 and 2015.[31]
However, in September 2012, SunTrust sold all of its Coke shares at the behest of its primary regulator, the Federal Reserve.[32] SunTrust was forced to resubmit its capital plan – known as Comprehensive Capital Analysis and Review (CCAR) – after it failed part of the stress test in March 2012. The Coke shares (or any stock holding) held by SunTrust would weigh on the bank's capital ratio under new capital rules within Basel III. Thus, SunTrust decided to accelerate its plan and sold the Coke shares earlier than expected.[33]
2014 National Mortgage Settlement
In 2014, the Federal government together with state attorneys general in 49 states and the District of Columbia reached a settlement requiring SunTrust Mortgage, Inc., to provide $500 million in various forms of relief to mortgage borrowers. The United States District Court for the District of Columbia entered the Consent Order on September 30, 2014. The consent order addressed SunTrust's alleged misconduct regarding its mortgage servicing and foreclosure practices. SunTrust was also required to create a 40 million dollar fund for the approximately 45,000 SunTrust borrowers who were foreclosed upon between January 1, 2008 and December 31, 2013. In addition, SunTrust was required to adhere to significant new homeowner protections. The consent order required that SunTrust follow the servicing standards set up by the 2012 National Mortgage Settlement (NMS) with the five largest banks.
Controversies
In September 2015 SunTrust laid off one hundred IT professionals with a controversial severance agreement clause by SunTrust that required laid-off employees to be available to help without pay for a period of two years. On October, 23rd Suntrust reversed course and removed the clause: "to make myself reasonably available to SunTrust regarding matters in which I have been involved in the course of my employment with SunTrust and/or about which I have knowledge as a result of my employment with SunTrust."[34]
Buildings and branches
Located at 200 South Orange Avenue, The SunTrust Center is the tallest building in downtown Orlando, Florida. The 35 story, 650,000 sq ft (60,000 m2) building was constructed in 1988 at a cost of approximately $100 million.[citation needed] It is constructed of reinforced concrete and granite with marble finishes and features 17 elevators.







SunTrust Plaza in Atlanta, Georgia









Suntrust Bank in Gaithersburg, Maryland









SunTrust Building in Washington, D.C.









SunTrust Tower in Jacksonville, Florida









SunTrust Center in Orlando, Florida









SunTrust building in Tampa, Florida









SunTrust branch in Durham, North Carolina









SunTrust Bank in Hendersonville, Tennessee




References


^ a b c "SunTrust Corporate Profile". SunTrust.com. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ a b SunTrust Banks (STI) annual SEC income statement filing via Wikinvest
^ https://www.nyse.com/quote/XNYS:STI
^ SunTrust Banks (STI) annual SEC balance sheet filing via Wikinvest
^ "FDIC Institution Directory: SunTrust Bank". 
^ a b "Historical Highlight". SunTrust.com. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ a b Garrett, Franklin M. (1969). Atlanta and environs : A Chronicle of Its People and Events, 1880s-1930s. Athens, Ga.: University of Georgia Press. p. 235. ISBN 0-8203-0264-3. 
^ a b Borowsky, Bruce (2005-03-11). "SunTrust Banks (Trust Company Bank)". New Georgia Encyclopedia. Georgia Humanities Council. Retrieved 2006-12-10. 
^ "Orlando City Planning" (PDF). CityofOrlando.net. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ "Sun Bank Earnings Reported". Lakeland Ledger. February 12, 1975. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ a b Stuart, Reginald (May 16, 1983). "FLORIDA'S BANK-MERGER SPREE". New York Times. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ a b https://www.suntrust.com/docs/pdf/newsroom/history_highlights.pdf
^ "SunTrust to buy National Commerce Financial". Atlanta Business Chronicle. 2004-05-09. p. 1. Retrieved 2007-04-08. 
^ "Comvest Invests in BEL USA, Adds On Branders.com". PitchBook. 17 March 2014. Retrieved 30 December 2014. 
^ Dunford, Thomas (24 December 2013). "The Morning Leverage: What’s Waiting in Private Equity’s Stocking?". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 30 December 2014. 
^ "Comvest Investment Partners IV, L.P.; Amin Rahman Ramjee". Federal Trade Commission. 20 December 2013. Retrieved 30 December 2014. 
^ Correia, Margarida. "SunTrust Private Wealth Management Launches Medical Specialty Group". Bank Investment Consultant. Retrieved 27 June 2014. 
^ Tucker, Tim (16 September 2014). "Braves name their new stadium: SunTrust Park". ajc.com. Retrieved 26 May 2015. 
^ Riley, Cindy (13 May 2015). "SunTrust Park to House Atlanta Braves in 2017". constructionequipmentguide.com. Retrieved 26 May 2015. 
^ a b "Barclays Global Presentation" (PDF). SunTrust.com. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ Bizjournals
^ "Aleem Gillani". Suntrust.com. Retrieved 30 September 2016. 
^ Adams, Tony (July 11, 2016). "Synovus taps SunTrust executive for chief financial officer". ledger-enquirer.com. Retrieved 30 September 2016. 
^ Nemeroff, Evan (March 20, 2015). "Zions Taps SunTrust Treasurer to Replace Retiring Chief Financial Officer". American Banker. Retrieved 30 September 2016. 
^ "Chief Financial Officer (CFO) Janet Haugen to Retire from Unisys; Company Names Inder M. Singh to Succeed Haugen as CFO". Retrieved 30 September 2016. 
^ Coporate. "Coca-Cola Moves Its Secret Formula to The World of Coca-Cola". Coca-Cola Journey. Coca-Cola Company. Retrieved 28 June 2016. 
^ Stafford, Leon. "Coke hides its secret formula in plain sight in World of Coca-Cola move". The Atlanta Journal-Constitution. The Atlanta Journal-Constitution. Retrieved 28 June 2016. 
^ "Officers & Directors". SunTrust Banks, Inc. Retrieved 2007-04-08. 
^ "Board Of Directors". The Coca-Cola Company. Retrieved 2007-04-08. 
^ "SunTrust Selling Coke". USAToday.com. May 15, 2007. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ Gross, Daniel (7/23/08). "DESPERATE BANKS SELLING OFF HARD ASSETS". Newsweek. Retrieved 23 September 2016.  Check date values in: |date= (help)
^ MATTHIAS RIEKER and SAABIRA CHAUDHURI (October 22, 2012). "SunTrust Profit Soars on Coke Stock Sale". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ Benoit, David (September 6, 2012). "SunTrust Sells Coke Shares and Bad Loans". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ http://www.computerworld.com/article/2996527/it-outsourcing/in-turnabout-suntrust-removes-contentious-severance-clause.html


External links

SunTrust Banks, Inc. - official site



Business data for SunTrust Banks: Google Finance
Yahoo! Finance
Reuters
SEC filings



Yahoo! - SunTrust Banks, Inc. Company Profile







v
t
e


50 largest banks and bank holding companies in the United States






Ally
American Express
Bank of America
Bank of New York Mellon
Barclays*
BB&T
BBVA*
BMO*
BNP Paribas*
Capital One
Charles Schwab
CIT
Citigroup
Citizens
Comerica
Credit Suisse*
Deutsche Bank*
Discover
E-Trade
Fifth Third
Goldman Sachs
HSBC*
Huntington
JPMorgan Chase
KeyBank
M&T
Mizuho*
Morgan Stanley
MUFG Union Bank*
Mutual of Omaha
New York Community
Northern Trust
People's United
PNC
Popular
Royal Bank of Canada*
Regions
Banco Santander*
State Farm
State Street
SunTrust
SVB
Synchrony
Toronto Dominion*
TIAA
U.S. Bancorp
UBS*
USAA
Wells Fargo
Zions








* indicates the U.S. subsidiary of a non-U.S. bank. Inclusion on this list is based on U.S. assets only, and is current as of March 31, 2017.












v
t
e


Atlanta companies






Aaron's, Inc.
AGCO (Duluth)
American Megatrends (Gwinnett County)
Arby's (Sandy Springs)
AT&T Mobility
Atlanta Bread Company (Smyrna)
Atlanta Gas Light
BellSouth
Chick-fil-A (College Park)
Church's Chicken (Sandy Springs)
Coca-Cola
Cox Enterprises
Delta Air Lines
EarthLink
Equifax
ExpressJet (College Park)
Georgia Natural Gas
Georgia-Pacific
Georgia Power
Holiday Inn
Holiday Inn Express
The Home Depot (Cobb County)
Hooters
Intercontinental Exchange
Krystal
Kool Smiles (Marietta)
Merial (Duluth)
NCR Corporation (Gwinnett County)
Newell Brands
Popeyes (Sandy Springs)
RaceTrac
Rheem
Scientific Atlanta (Lawrenceville)
Simmons Bedding Company
Southern Company
SunTrust Banks
Turner Broadcasting System
United Parcel Service (Sandy Springs)
Waffle House (Gwinnett County)
The Weather Channel (Cobb County)










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=SunTrust_Banks&oldid=779392583"					
Categories: 1811 establishments in VirginiaBanks based in Georgia (U.S. state)Banks established in 1811Coca-ColaCompanies based in AtlantaCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeEconomy of Richmond, VirginiaEconomy of the Southeastern United StatesHidden categories: CS1 errors: datesWikipedia indefinitely semi-protected pagesPages using deprecated image syntaxPages using infobox company with unsupported parametersAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from August 2009 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschفارسیFrançaisItalianoNorsk bokmålPortuguêsРусский 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 8 May 2017, at 17:07.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









SunTrust Banks - Wikipedia




















 







SunTrust Banks

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


SunTrust Banks, Inc.





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: STI
S&P 500 Component


Industry
Banking


Founded
1985; 32 years ago (1985)


Headquarters
SunTrust Plaza
Atlanta, Georgia, U.S.



Number of locations

1,400 branches
2,160 ATMs[1]



Area served

Southeastern United States



Key people

William H. Rogers, Jr.
Chairman and CEO


Products
Financial Services


Revenue
 US$8.2 billion (FY 2013)[2]



Net income

 US$1.34 billion (FY 2013)[2]


Total assets
 US$204.875 billion (2016)[3]


Total equity
 US$21.4 billion (FY 2013)[4]



Number of employees

24,000 (09/01/2016)


Website
SunTrust.com






SunTrust locations in the United States.


SunTrust Banks, Inc., is an American bank holding company. The largest subsidiary is SunTrust Bank. It had US$175 billion in assets as of December 31, 2013.[5] SunTrust Bank's most direct corporate parent was established in 1891 in Atlanta, where its headquarters remain.
As of September 2016, SunTrust Bank operates 1,400 bank branches and 2,160 ATMs across 11 southeastern states and Washington, D.C..[1] The bank's primary businesses include deposits, lending, credit cards, and trust and investment services. Through its various subsidiaries, the company provides corporate and investment banking, capital market services, mortgage banking, and wealth management. It has nearly 24,000 employees.



Contents


1 History

1.1 Trust Company of Georgia
1.2 Sun Bank
1.3 Transformational merger


2 Current operations and structure

2.1 Executives


3 Relationship with Coca-Cola
4 2014 National Mortgage Settlement
5 Controversies
6 Buildings and branches
7 References
8 External links



History
Trust Company of Georgia
On 21 September 1891, SunTrust's most direct corporate ancestor, the Trust Company of Georgia, was granted a charter by the Georgia General Assembly as the Commercial Travelers' Savings Bank.[6] The founders were John M. Green, Joel Hurt, H. L. Atwater, W. A. Hansell, T. J. Hightower, J. G. Oglesby, J. D. Turner, John B. Daniel, Joseph Hirsch, Leon Lieberman, Louis Wellhouse, A. J. McBride, D. O. Dougherty, W. A. Gregg, W. W. Draper, A. C. Hook, W. T. Ashford, George W. Brooke, C. I. Branan, and C. D. Montgomery.[7]
In November 1893, it restructured as a trust company and renamed itself Trust Company of Georgia.[7][8]
Sun Bank
The earliest predecessor of Sun Bank was founded in 1911 as The People's National Bank. In 1920, it became the First National Bank. During the Great Depression, the First National Bank and Trust Company failed in the early 1930s. It was reorganized on Valentine’s Day 1934 as the First National Bank at Orlando.[6] In 1973, the bank merged with other Orlando banks to become Sun Banks.[9] It had three bank-related subsidiaries and total assets of $1.713 billion as of December 31, 1973.[10]
In the early 1980s, Sun went on a buying spree that raised at least some eyebrows, as it positioned the bank for the state of Florida to eventually allow interstate banking. It rolled up 81-year-old Hillsboro Bank, based in Plant City, an institution with $150 million in assets and then the third-oldest state-chartered bank. It also bought Florida State Bank of Tallahassee, which had tried to merge with Sun in 1973, but the deal fell apart when the economy soured.[11]
Then, in May 1983, Sun announced a deal for Miami-based Flagship Bank Inc., with $3.3 billion in assets, that catapulted Sun to be one of the Florida's largest bank holding companies. The Flagship deal was the seventh struck by Sun in less than a year.[11]
Transformational merger
The current SunTrust Banks, Inc., was the result of a merger between the Trust Company of Georgia and SunBanks, Inc., of Orlando, Florida in 1985. The merged company operated as Trust Company Bank in Georgia and Sun Bank in Florida until 1995, when all banks took the SunTrust name.
In 1986, shortly after the Trust Company–SunBanks merger, SunTrust purchased Third National Corporation of Nashville, though it continued to use the Third National name in Tennessee until 1995. SunTrust purchased Crestar Financial Corporation of Richmond, Virginia in 1998 expanding the company’s footprint into Virginia, Maryland, and the District of Columbia. Crestar's (and SunTrust's) earliest predecessor, Farmers Bank of Alexandria, was founded in 1811.[12]
In 1988, Suntrust is added to the S&P 500 Stock Price Index.[12]
In 2001, SunTrust purchased the institutional businesses of the Robinson-Humphrey Company, LLC. creating SunTrust Robinson-Humphrey.
The company bought Memphis-based National Commerce Financial Corporation (NCF) for $7 billion in 2004. The bank operated as National Bank of Commerce in South Carolina, Tennessee, Mississippi, Arkansas, Alabama, Georgia, Virginia, and West Virginia and as Central Carolina Bank and Trust in North Carolina. This acquisition allowed SunTrust to enter Alabama, the Carolinas, and West Virginia for the first time, and substantially increased its footprint in the other states.[13]
In 2013, the bank led a bank group that included Fifth Third Bank and Florida Community Bank that helped finance the acquirement of BEL USA, the parent company that owns DiscountMugs, by Comvest Partners, a private equity firm.[14][15][16]
In 2014, SunTrust announced it would launch a medical specialty group to work with independent medical practices.[17]
On Sept. 16, 2014, the Atlanta Braves announced the name of their new Cobb County stadium: SunTrust Park.[18] SunTrust Park, which is expected to be unveiled in time for the first pitch of the 2017 season, will serve as the new home of the Atlanta Braves. The $1.1 billion construction project in Cobb County will include restaurants, shops, offices, a hotel, and residential spaces directly connected to the park. The Braves organization is making history by building out the development at the same time the stadium is being constructed.[19]
Current operations and structure
The company operates three primary business units: Consumer Banking & Private Wealth Management, Wholesale Banking, and Mortgage.[20]

Business Mix, as of June 30, 2016[20]

Business Line
Percentage of Revenue


Consumer Banking
32%


Corporate & Investment Banking
20%


Commercial & Business Banking
14%


Private Wealth Management
12%


Mortgage
11%


Consumer Lending
8%


Commercial Real Estate
3%


As of September 2016, SunTrust Bank operates 1,400 bank branches and 2,160 ATMs across including Alabama, Arkansas, Florida, Georgia, Maryland, Mississippi, North Carolina, South Carolina, Tennessee, Virginia, West Virginia, and Washington, D.C.[1]
Executives


Individual (Position)
Years


William H. Rogers, Jr. (Chairman, President and CEO)
2011 – Present


James M. Wells, III (Chairman, President and CEO)
2007 – 2011


L. Phillip Humann (Chairman, President and CEO)
1998 – 2007


James B. “Jimmy” Williams (Chairman, President and CEO)
1990 – 1998


Robert M. Strickland (Chairman/SunTrust; president of Trust Company in 1973)
1978 – 1990


On April 21, 2011, William H. Rogers, Jr. began a transition into the CEO role previously held by Jim Wells, who retired December 31, 2011. Formerly SunTrust's COO, Rogers assumed the title of CEO on June 1, 2011. Rogers had been named President in 2008.[21] At that time, the current Chief Financial Officer (CFO) is Aleem Gillani was named in April 2011.[22]
In 2015 and 2016, two corporate treasurers have gone on to become CFOs at large regional banks, including Kevin Blair at Zions Bancorporation and Paul Burdiss at Synovus,[23][24] and a unit strategy head, Inder M. Singh, became CFO at IT firm Unisys.[25]
Relationship with Coca-Cola
SunTrust had a long-standing relationship with The Coca-Cola Company. In 1919, Ernest Woodruff, president of the Trust Company from 1904 to 1922, and W. C. Bradley bought The Coca-Cola Company for $25 million and restructured. The Trust Company of Georgia helped underwrite the initial public offering, accepting shares of Coke in exchange for its services.[8] Four years later, his son, Robert W. Woodruff, was elected Coca-Cola's president, a title he would hold until 1954 and was a board member until 1984.
As a result, SunTrust owned 48.3 million shares (3.58%) of Coke as of 2006, which had a GAAP cost basis of $110,000. In addition, the original copy of the formula for Coca-Cola was stored in a safe deposit box of an eventual SunTrust location in Atlanta (originally a Trust Company Bank location) from 1925 to 2011.[26] It was eventually moved to a purpose built vault in the World of Coca-Cola, also in Atlanta.[27]
Over the years, Coca-Cola executives would sit on SunTrust's board of directors[28] and SunTrust execs would sit on Coca-Cola's board.[29]
SunTrust started to divest Coke shares in May 2007, when it sold 4.5 million, or 9% of its position.[30] In 2008, the bank sold another 10 million shares, donated 3.6 million to SunTrust's charitable foundation, and crafted a plan to sell more shares in 2014 and 2015.[31]
However, in September 2012, SunTrust sold all of its Coke shares at the behest of its primary regulator, the Federal Reserve.[32] SunTrust was forced to resubmit its capital plan – known as Comprehensive Capital Analysis and Review (CCAR) – after it failed part of the stress test in March 2012. The Coke shares (or any stock holding) held by SunTrust would weigh on the bank's capital ratio under new capital rules within Basel III. Thus, SunTrust decided to accelerate its plan and sold the Coke shares earlier than expected.[33]
2014 National Mortgage Settlement
In 2014, the Federal government together with state attorneys general in 49 states and the District of Columbia reached a settlement requiring SunTrust Mortgage, Inc., to provide $500 million in various forms of relief to mortgage borrowers. The United States District Court for the District of Columbia entered the Consent Order on September 30, 2014. The consent order addressed SunTrust's alleged misconduct regarding its mortgage servicing and foreclosure practices. SunTrust was also required to create a 40 million dollar fund for the approximately 45,000 SunTrust borrowers who were foreclosed upon between January 1, 2008 and December 31, 2013. In addition, SunTrust was required to adhere to significant new homeowner protections. The consent order required that SunTrust follow the servicing standards set up by the 2012 National Mortgage Settlement (NMS) with the five largest banks.
Controversies
In September 2015 SunTrust laid off one hundred IT professionals with a controversial severance agreement clause by SunTrust that required laid-off employees to be available to help without pay for a period of two years. On October, 23rd Suntrust reversed course and removed the clause: "to make myself reasonably available to SunTrust regarding matters in which I have been involved in the course of my employment with SunTrust and/or about which I have knowledge as a result of my employment with SunTrust."[34]
Buildings and branches
Located at 200 South Orange Avenue, The SunTrust Center is the tallest building in downtown Orlando, Florida. The 35 story, 650,000 sq ft (60,000 m2) building was constructed in 1988 at a cost of approximately $100 million.[citation needed] It is constructed of reinforced concrete and granite with marble finishes and features 17 elevators.







SunTrust Plaza in Atlanta, Georgia









Suntrust Bank in Gaithersburg, Maryland









SunTrust Building in Washington, D.C.









SunTrust Tower in Jacksonville, Florida









SunTrust Center in Orlando, Florida









SunTrust building in Tampa, Florida









SunTrust branch in Durham, North Carolina









SunTrust Bank in Hendersonville, Tennessee




References


^ a b c "SunTrust Corporate Profile". SunTrust.com. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ a b SunTrust Banks (STI) annual SEC income statement filing via Wikinvest
^ https://www.nyse.com/quote/XNYS:STI
^ SunTrust Banks (STI) annual SEC balance sheet filing via Wikinvest
^ "FDIC Institution Directory: SunTrust Bank". 
^ a b "Historical Highlight". SunTrust.com. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ a b Garrett, Franklin M. (1969). Atlanta and environs : A Chronicle of Its People and Events, 1880s-1930s. Athens, Ga.: University of Georgia Press. p. 235. ISBN 0-8203-0264-3. 
^ a b Borowsky, Bruce (2005-03-11). "SunTrust Banks (Trust Company Bank)". New Georgia Encyclopedia. Georgia Humanities Council. Retrieved 2006-12-10. 
^ "Orlando City Planning" (PDF). CityofOrlando.net. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ "Sun Bank Earnings Reported". Lakeland Ledger. February 12, 1975. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ a b Stuart, Reginald (May 16, 1983). "FLORIDA'S BANK-MERGER SPREE". New York Times. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ a b https://www.suntrust.com/docs/pdf/newsroom/history_highlights.pdf
^ "SunTrust to buy National Commerce Financial". Atlanta Business Chronicle. 2004-05-09. p. 1. Retrieved 2007-04-08. 
^ "Comvest Invests in BEL USA, Adds On Branders.com". PitchBook. 17 March 2014. Retrieved 30 December 2014. 
^ Dunford, Thomas (24 December 2013). "The Morning Leverage: What’s Waiting in Private Equity’s Stocking?". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 30 December 2014. 
^ "Comvest Investment Partners IV, L.P.; Amin Rahman Ramjee". Federal Trade Commission. 20 December 2013. Retrieved 30 December 2014. 
^ Correia, Margarida. "SunTrust Private Wealth Management Launches Medical Specialty Group". Bank Investment Consultant. Retrieved 27 June 2014. 
^ Tucker, Tim (16 September 2014). "Braves name their new stadium: SunTrust Park". ajc.com. Retrieved 26 May 2015. 
^ Riley, Cindy (13 May 2015). "SunTrust Park to House Atlanta Braves in 2017". constructionequipmentguide.com. Retrieved 26 May 2015. 
^ a b "Barclays Global Presentation" (PDF). SunTrust.com. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ Bizjournals
^ "Aleem Gillani". Suntrust.com. Retrieved 30 September 2016. 
^ Adams, Tony (July 11, 2016). "Synovus taps SunTrust executive for chief financial officer". ledger-enquirer.com. Retrieved 30 September 2016. 
^ Nemeroff, Evan (March 20, 2015). "Zions Taps SunTrust Treasurer to Replace Retiring Chief Financial Officer". American Banker. Retrieved 30 September 2016. 
^ "Chief Financial Officer (CFO) Janet Haugen to Retire from Unisys; Company Names Inder M. Singh to Succeed Haugen as CFO". Retrieved 30 September 2016. 
^ Coporate. "Coca-Cola Moves Its Secret Formula to The World of Coca-Cola". Coca-Cola Journey. Coca-Cola Company. Retrieved 28 June 2016. 
^ Stafford, Leon. "Coke hides its secret formula in plain sight in World of Coca-Cola move". The Atlanta Journal-Constitution. The Atlanta Journal-Constitution. Retrieved 28 June 2016. 
^ "Officers & Directors". SunTrust Banks, Inc. Retrieved 2007-04-08. 
^ "Board Of Directors". The Coca-Cola Company. Retrieved 2007-04-08. 
^ "SunTrust Selling Coke". USAToday.com. May 15, 2007. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ Gross, Daniel (7/23/08). "DESPERATE BANKS SELLING OFF HARD ASSETS". Newsweek. Retrieved 23 September 2016.  Check date values in: |date= (help)
^ MATTHIAS RIEKER and SAABIRA CHAUDHURI (October 22, 2012). "SunTrust Profit Soars on Coke Stock Sale". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ Benoit, David (September 6, 2012). "SunTrust Sells Coke Shares and Bad Loans". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 23 September 2016. 
^ http://www.computerworld.com/article/2996527/it-outsourcing/in-turnabout-suntrust-removes-contentious-severance-clause.html


External links

SunTrust Banks, Inc. - official site



Business data for SunTrust Banks: Google Finance
Yahoo! Finance
Reuters
SEC filings



Yahoo! - SunTrust Banks, Inc. Company Profile







v
t
e


50 largest banks and bank holding companies in the United States






Ally
American Express
Bank of America
Bank of New York Mellon
Barclays*
BB&T
BBVA*
BMO*
BNP Paribas*
Capital One
Charles Schwab
CIT
Citigroup
Citizens
Comerica
Credit Suisse*
Deutsche Bank*
Discover
E-Trade
Fifth Third
Goldman Sachs
HSBC*
Huntington
JPMorgan Chase
KeyBank
M&T
Mizuho*
Morgan Stanley
MUFG Union Bank*
Mutual of Omaha
New York Community
Northern Trust
People's United
PNC
Popular
Royal Bank of Canada*
Regions
Banco Santander*
State Farm
State Street
SunTrust
SVB
Synchrony
Toronto Dominion*
TIAA
U.S. Bancorp
UBS*
USAA
Wells Fargo
Zions








* indicates the U.S. subsidiary of a non-U.S. bank. Inclusion on this list is based on U.S. assets only, and is current as of March 31, 2017.












v
t
e


Atlanta companies






Aaron's, Inc.
AGCO (Duluth)
American Megatrends (Gwinnett County)
Arby's (Sandy Springs)
AT&T Mobility
Atlanta Bread Company (Smyrna)
Atlanta Gas Light
BellSouth
Chick-fil-A (College Park)
Church's Chicken (Sandy Springs)
Coca-Cola
Cox Enterprises
Delta Air Lines
EarthLink
Equifax
ExpressJet (College Park)
Georgia Natural Gas
Georgia-Pacific
Georgia Power
Holiday Inn
Holiday Inn Express
The Home Depot (Cobb County)
Hooters
Intercontinental Exchange
Krystal
Kool Smiles (Marietta)
Merial (Duluth)
NCR Corporation (Gwinnett County)
Newell Brands
Popeyes (Sandy Springs)
RaceTrac
Rheem
Scientific Atlanta (Lawrenceville)
Simmons Bedding Company
Southern Company
SunTrust Banks
Turner Broadcasting System
United Parcel Service (Sandy Springs)
Waffle House (Gwinnett County)
The Weather Channel (Cobb County)










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=SunTrust_Banks&oldid=779392583"					
Categories: 1811 establishments in VirginiaBanks based in Georgia (U.S. state)Banks established in 1811Coca-ColaCompanies based in AtlantaCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeEconomy of Richmond, VirginiaEconomy of the Southeastern United StatesHidden categories: CS1 errors: datesWikipedia indefinitely semi-protected pagesPages using deprecated image syntaxPages using infobox company with unsupported parametersAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from August 2009 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
View source
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschفارسیFrançaisItalianoNorsk bokmålPortuguêsРусский 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 8 May 2017, at 17:07.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Sony RX10 III Digital Camera DSC-RX10M3 Cyber-shot B&H Photo












































































































 












					
						Other B&H Sites - Gov, EDU & Corp.



B&H Main sitetwubucbfzxfu


Federal Marketplace


Students & Educators


Government, Education & Corporate




Read 

800.606.6969 / 212.444.6615
Help
About Us

Live Chat
				




The Professional's Source
Since 1973


FREE NYC STORE PICKUP Ready Within the Hour
>> Free Shipping on most orders over $49














 























Hello,
Log In


		    Sign In Login/Register


My Account 







0
My Cart









Log Into Your Account

Log In


Create a B&H Account






My Account





My Orders




Wish List









Sign Out




My Account





My Orders




Wish List




Notifications
   











Photography
Computers
Pro Video
Lighting
Pro Audio
Mobile
TVs & Entertainment
Camcorders
Surveillance
Optics
Audio-Visual
Used



			Specials
		







									Specials & Rebates See All Specials >








1 of  Deals Today





















































 

Details 







				Most orders* over $49 qualify for .

							Orders placed after 4pm on weekdays will not ship until the next business day. Orders placed after 12pm Fridays will not ship until the following Monday. 
			Faster shipping methods may be available; just upgrade during checkout.

			*Some exclusions apply.
Close








				Shipping Location
			

				Enter new zip code to refresh estimated delivery time.
			


Update


				Unrecognized Zip Code
			












Home
 
					
						
							
							Photography
						
					
				 
 
					
						
							
							Digital Cameras
						
					
				 
 
					
						
							
							
								Point & Shoot Cameras
							
							
							
						
					
				 
 Sony Cyber-shot DSC-RX10 III 











Sony
 Cyber-shot DSC-RX10 III Digital Camera
										
									








Sony

								
									Cyber-shot DSC-RX10 III Digital Camera
								
							





								B&H # SODSCRX10M3
								
									
									
									 
							
MFR # DSCRX10M3/B














									Authorized Dealer
								


























Front Top View



Front View



Flash up



Front Left View



Front Left Top View



Front Right View



Back View















Left-Side View



Terminal Open View



Left-Side Lens Extended



Right-Side View



Top View



Top View lens Extended



Right-Side View



Phantom Internal View



Blades Circular Aperature



Lens component view



Shown in Use



Shown in Use
twubucbfzxfu


Shown in Use



Shown in Use



Shown in Use



Shown in Use



Shown in Use



Shown in Use

Show MoreLess





360° View







Customer Photos




Close






 
 

























Now Viewing: 































In Stock



Update Location
close



Enter new zip code to refresh estimated delivery time.

Update


Unrecognized Zip Code





		
			Order
		
	
		
			in the next
			0:00:00

	
		to ship
		
today



X

							
 								Place your order by 4pm Mon Jul 24 and your order will ship the same day. For further details see delivery estimates in cart. International orders are processed the next shipping day.
								
						




Free Expedited Shipping






							
								Product Highlights
							
							
						

20.1MP 1" Exmor RS BSI CMOS Sensor
BIONZ X Image Processor
Zeiss Vario-Sonnar T* f/2.4-4 Zoom Lens
24-600mm (35mm Equivalent)
2.36m-Dot OLED Tru-Finder EVF
3.0" 1.228m-Dot Tilting Xtra Fine LCD
UHD 4K30 Video, Full HD 1080p at 960 fps
Built-In Wi-Fi with NFC
ISO 12800 and 14 fps Continuous Shooting
Optical SteadyShot Image Stabilization

Show moreShow less











								Reviews 151



Q&A






						Configuration:
						Base


								
									Base
								
							twubucbfzxfu

								
									Deluxe Kit
								
							

								
									Free Accessory Kit
								
							










See Used

from
$1,099.95






			$0.00 Tax Collected Outside NY and NJ 


Sales Tax

							B&H only collects sales tax on orders shipped to addresses in the States of New York and New Jersey.

						You may be responsible for state and local sales/use taxes when filing your tax returns. Please check your local sales tax laws.
				








								You Pay:
							

								
								
									
									
										$1,398.00
										







Receive 2% Reward 











Qty

Add to Cart


View Cart















										Add to Wish List
									

 Item in Wish List
									















Essential Kits


Shop Used
							
								
								
								
								
								
								
								from
							
                            $1,099.95


trade in your gear for cash






 
Email


Print






   








Overview





Specs

twubucbfzxfu



Quick Compare





Reviews 
										151





Q&A 
										





Accessories





 
to top








Sony DSC-RX10 III overview




1Description











In the Field with the Sony RX10 III
Read More 

















First Look: Sony DSC-RX10 III





Blending fast performance with long reach, the Cyber-shot DSC-RX10 III from Sony is a versatile digital camera optimized for multimedia image-makers working in a broad variety of situations. Featuring a large 20.1MP 1" Exmor RS CMOS sensor, which utilizes both back-illuminated and stacked technologies, a high degree of image quality can be attained, with notable clarity, reduced noise, and sensitivity to ISO 12800. The sensor's design also integrates a dedicated DRAM chip to provide faster readout speeds that, when combined with the BIONZ X image processor, avail fast continuous shooting up to 14 fps. This also helps to reduce unwanted distortion caused by rolling shutter, and permits recording UHD 4K30 video internally, as well as slow motion Full HD 1080p video at 960 fps. Equally as impressive as the imaging capabilities, the RX10 III is also characterized by its 25x Zeiss Vario-Sonnar T* zoom lens, which spans an impressive 24-600mm equivalent focal length range and uses Optical SteadyShot image stabilization to minimize the effects of camera shake. Its optical design incorporates eight extra-low dispersion elements and six aspherical elements to control a variety of aberrations throughout the zoom range, and its f/2.4-4 maximum aperture range benefits working in low-light conditions. Mixing speed and reach, the RX10 III is well-suited to the photographer or videographer looking for the all-in-one camera to handle a variety of working situations.

Beyond the imaging capabilities, the camera is also notable for its robust physical design that includes both a 2.36m-dot OLED electronic viewfinder along with a tilting 3.0" 1.228m-dot LCD monitor. The intuitive design also features three dedicated control rings on the lens-a zoom ring, a manual focus ring, and an aperture ring-and the aperture ring can be de-clicked for smooth, silent aperture adjustments. The magnesium alloy body is also weather-sealed to permit working in trying environments. Additionally, for sharing and control flexibility, built-in Wi-Fi with NFC is also available for wireless image sharing and remote camera control from a linked smartphone or tablet.




20.1MP 1" Exmor RS BSI CMOS Sensor and BIONZ X Image Processor 


										
												A large 1" 20.1MP Exmor RS CMOS sensor pairs with the BIONZ X image sensor to realize a high degree of image clarity with reduced noise levels to support working in a wide array of environments with sensitivities up to ISO 12800. The Exmor RS sensor employs a unique stacked structure with a back-illuminated design for efficient light gathering abilities, as well as faster performance. The design also incorporates a dedicated DRAM chip on the back of the sensor to facilitate quick image processing in order to boost signal capacity and readout speeds for quick continuous shooting, up to 14 fps with reduced blackout, and slow motion video recording at up to 960 fps. An Anti-Distortion Shutter is also a product of the fast readout speeds, and helps to greatly reduce unwanted distortion caused by rolling shutter effects.

The sensor and processor also contribute to fast autofocus performance that benefits both stills shooting and video recording. This Fast Intelligent AF system is able to achieve precise focus in as little as 0.09 seconds to suit working with quickly moving subjects. By continuously tracking and assessing subjects, the focusing system is able to quickly lock onto subjects prior to half-pressing the shutter button and a subject detection algorithm then intelligently predicts the proper point of focus to aid in acquiring sharp imagery of moving subjects.
										  
										 


Zeiss Vario-Sonnar T* 25x Zoom Lens 


										
												Pairing with the imaging assets, the RX10 III is most distinctly characterized by its expansive 25x zoom lens. This Zeiss Vario-Sonnar T* lens spans a 24-600mm equivalent focal length range, and has a variable maximum aperture of f/2.4-4 for adept performance from wide-angle to super telephoto. The optical design incorporates five extra-low dispersion elements, two extra-low dispersion aspherical elements, and one Super ED element to control a range of chromatic aberrations throughout the zoom range for increased clarity and color accuracy. An advanced aspherical (AA) element and five aspherical elements are also featured to reduce spherical aberrations for improved sharpness and resolution. Additionally, the esteemed Zeiss T* anti-reflective coating has been applied to individual elements to reduce flare and ghosting for increased contrast when working in strong lighting conditions.

Complementing the lens' reach, Optical SteadyShot image stabilization also helps to minimize the appearance of camera shake by up to 4.5 stops for sharper handheld shooting. The lens also sports a rounded nine-blade diaphragm to produce smooth bokeh, and, despite its long reach, can also focus as closely as 1.2" with a 0.42x maximum magnification for working with close-up subjects.
										  
										 


UHD 4K Video Recording 


										
												Internal video recording is possible in a range of resolutions up to UHD 4K30 as well as high-speed recording in Full HD 1080p at 120 fps. Recording is done using full pixel readout, without pixel binning, in order to avoid the occurrence of moiré and jaggies, and the fast readout speeds of the sensor help to avoid moving subject distortion due to the effects of rolling shutter. Both 4K and Full HD recording is possible in the 100 Mbps XAVC S format, which is contained within an MP4 wrapper, with 4:2:0 color sampling when recording internally, or 4:2:2 sampling with the use of an optional external recorder via HDMI output.

Making use of the back-illuminated sensor design, customizable picture profiles, color settings, and gamma controls are also available to effectively extend the possible dynamic range. Users can adjust the gamma, black level, knee, color level, and more. Also users can use the same S-Log2 Gamma Curve that is found on high end Sony Cinema cameras that squeezes up to 1300% more dynamic range into the video signal than traditional REC709, for increased post-production flexibility. Multiple timecode recording and user bit options are also provided to suit different editing workflows.

Beyond UHD 4K recording, the RX10 III also makes use of the fast readout speeds by way of availing a range of high frame rate (HFR) recording settings, with the ability to record Full HD movies at up to 960 fps for 40x slow motion playback.
										  
										 


Body Design and Built-In Wi-Fi 


A bright, high-resolution XGA OLED Tru-Finder sports a 2.36m-dot resolution for clear eye-level monitoring of the scene, as well as the ability to preview exposure adjustments prior to shooting.
Alternatively, a rear 3.0" 1.228m-dot Xtra Fine TFT LCD is available for monitoring and review, and features a 107° upward, 42° downward tilting design to benefit working from high and low angles. The screen also uses WhiteMagic technology for improved visibility in bright conditions.

A robust magnesium-alloy body design is both dust- and moisture-resistant to support use in harsh environments.
The manually-operated aperture ring permits intuitive tactile control over exposure settings, and the ring can be de-clicked for smooth, silent performance to suit video applications. Manual focus and zoom rings are also incorporated in the lens' design.
A top LCD panel can be used to quickly check key exposure and other settings.
A range of customizable function buttons can be assigned to any one of 58 different custom functions.
The included NP-FW50 rechargeable lithium-ion battery offers approximately 420 shots per charge when working with the LCD monitor, or 370 shots per charge when working with the EVF.
Both an external microphone jack and a headphone jack are available for using optional external mics and monitoring your audio in real time.
Built-in Wi-Fi with NFC permits wirelessly sharing imagery to a linked mobile device for instant sharing online, and also allows a smartphone or tablet to remotely control the camera or display a live view image. Mobile devices can be paired via NFC or via a QR code displayed on the camera for non NFC-enabled phones or tablets.
PlayMemories Camera Apps are also supported via the built-in Wi-Fi connection, and allow you to personalize the camera's features depending on specific shooting styles. Apps are available to suit creating portraits, detailed close-ups, sports, time lapse, motion shot, and other specific types of imagery.



Other Camera Features 



Zoom Assist can be assigned to a custom function button and used to automatically zoom out from the scene in order to re-locate a subject, and then released to quickly return to the zoomed-in position.
Step Zoom lets you configure the zoom ring to only cycle through fixed popular focal lengths as the ring is rotated, including 24, 28, 35, 50, 70, 85, 100, 135, 200, 300, 400, 500, and 600mm. Quick Zoom, on the other hand, can be assigned to a custom function button and lets you move throughout the zoom range in a fluid, seamless manner by rotating the zoom ring.
A Silent Shooting mode makes use of an electronic shutter function for completely silent performance that is ideal for photographing in noise-sensitive areas. This electronic shutter also permits working with shutter speeds up to 1/32,000 sec. for photographing in bright conditions.
Clear Image Zoom can be used to magnify the center of scenes by 2x to effectively extend the reach of the lens. This digital zoom technology uses an intelligent interpolation process to minimize the amount of image degradation in order to produce realistic, high-quality images.
Eye AF is a dedicated autofocus mode that bases focus on recognized subjects' eye for portraits, and can be configured to prioritize either the subject's right or left eye.
White balance adjustment can be finely controlled using detailed sliders that span the amber-blue and magenta-green axes for more precise control over how color tones appear in various lighting conditions.
Benefitting manual focus operation, Manual Focus Assist can be used to magnify a portion of the scene for making more precise, detailed adjustments. Peaking is also available to highlight strong edges of contrast for more objective determining over sharp focus.
A Dual Rec mode allows you to record 17MP stills, without pixel binning, while simultaneously recording video. Auto Dual Rec takes this process further by automatically recording stills at a chosen frequency or when a new composition or subject is recognized.
When recording in UHD 4K, 8MP still frame grabs can be saved during playback for use as a still image. If working in Full HD, 2MP stills can be taken from video files.
Scene Selection: Portrait, Sports Action, Macro, Landscape, Sunset, Night Scene, Handheld Twilight, Night Portrait, and Anti Motion Blur.
Picture Effect: Toy Camera, Pop Color, Posterization, Retro Photo, Soft High-Key, Partial Color, High Contrast Mono, Soft Focus, HDR Painting, Richtone Monochrome, Miniature, Watercolor, and Illustration.
Creative Style: Standard, Vivid, Neutral, Clear, Deep, Light, Portrait, Landscape, Sunset, Night Scene, Autumn Leaves, Black & White, Sepia, and Style Box.






UPC: 027242899681





															In the Box
														



									Sony Cyber-shot DSC-RX10 III Digital Camera
								



								
									
									NP-FW50 Lithium-Ion Rechargeable Battery (1020mAh)
							    
							    	twubucbfzxfu


								
								
									
									
										AC Adapter
									
								
							

								
								
									
									
										Micro USB Cable
									
								
							

								
								
									
									
										Shoulder Strap
									
								
							

								
								
									
									
										Lens Cap
									
								
							

								
								
									
									
										Shoe Cap
									
								
							

								
								
									
									
										Lens Hood
									
								
							

								
								
									
									
										Eyepiece Cup
									
								
							

								
								
									
									
										Limited 1-Year Warranty
									
								
							






 









Unveiled: Sony Cyber-shot DSC-RX10 III Goes All the Way to 600mm
Shawn C. Steiner
03/29/2016









Seven Pocketable Point-and-Shoots for your Next Adventure
Shawn C. Steiner
07/14/2017









How a Point-and-Shoot Became My New Best Friend
Shawn C. Steiner
07/06/2017









Trade in Your Old Camera for a New DxO ONE
Todd Vorenkamp
04/26/2017









The Best Waterproof Cameras for Swimming and Diving
Ryan Zanoni
11/06/2016










More from Manufacturer

















Table of Contents

1Description










Sony DSC-RX10 III specs






Imaging




								Pixels
									
									
									
							

								Actual: 21.0 MegapixelEffective: 20.1 Megapixel
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Sensor
									
									
									
							

								1" (13.2 x 8.8 mm) CMOS
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								File Formats
									
									
									
							

Still Images: JPEG, RAWMovies: AVCHD Ver. 2.0, MP4, XAVC SAudio: AAC LC, AC3, Dolby Digital 2ch, Linear PCM (Stereo)
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Max Resolution
									
									
									
							

								5472 x 3648
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Aspect Ratio
									
									
									
							

								1:1, 3:2, 4:3, 16:9
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Image Stabilization
									
									
									
							

								Optical & Digital
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Color Spaces
									
									
									
							

								sRGB, Adobe RGB
	                                
	                                
	                                
							







Optics




								Lens
									
									
									
							

								Carl Zeiss Vario-Sonnar, 18 elements in 13 groups6 Aspherical, 8 EDEFL: 8.8-220mm (35 mm equivalent: 24-600mm)Aperture: f/2.4 (W) - 4 (T) to f/16
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Filter Thread
									
									
									
							

								72mm
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Zoom
									
									
									
							

								Optical: 25xClear Image Zoom: 2xDigital: 4x
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Focus Range
									
									
									
							

								Wide: 1.18" (3 cm) - InfinityTelephoto: 2.36' (72 cm) - Infinity
	                                
	                                
	                                
							







Exposure Control




								ISO Sensitivity
									
									
									
							

								Auto, 100-12800 (Extended Mode: 64-12800)
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Shutter
									
									
									
							

								Type: MechanicalSpeed: 30 - 1/2000 Second in Bulb ModeType: MechanicalSpeed: 30 - 1/2000 Second in Program ModeType: ElectronicSpeed: 30 - 1/32000 Second in Aperture Priority ModeType: ElectronicSpeed: 4 - 1/32000 Second in Auto Mode
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Exposure Metering
									
									
									
							

								Center-Weighted, Multi, Spot
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Exposure Modes
									
									
									
							

								Modes: Aperture Priority, Auto, Manual, Memory Recall, Movie, Panorama Shot, Program, Scene Selection, Shutter PriorityCompensation: -3 EV to +3 EV (in 1/3 EV Steps)
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								White Balance Modes
									
									
									
							

								Auto, Cloudy, Color Temperature, Custom, Daylight, Flash, Fluorescent (Cool White), Fluorescent (Day White), Fluorescent (Daylight), Fluorescent (Warm White), Incandescent, Shade
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Continuous Shooting
									
									
									
							

								Up to 14 fps at 20.1 MPUp to 5 fps at 20.1 MP
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Self-Timer
									
									
									
							

								2, 5, 10 Seconds
	                                
	                                
	                                
							







Flash




								Flash Modes
									
									
									
							

								AutoFlash OnOffRear SyncSlow SyncWireless
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Built-In Flash
									
									
									
							

								Yes
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Maximum Effective Flash Range
									
									
									
							

								Wide: 3.28 - 35.43' (1 - 10.8 m)Telephoto: 3.28 - 21.33' (1 - 6.5 m)
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								External Flash Connection
									
									
									
							

								Hot Shoe, Wireless
	                                
	                                
	                                
							







Memory




								Memory Card Type
									
									
									
							

								SDSDHCSDXCMemory Stick DuoMemory Stick Pro DuoMemory Stick PRO Duo (High Speed)Memory Stick PRO HG-DuoMemory Stick MicroMemory Stick Micro (M2)
	                                
	                                
	                                
							







Recording




								Video Recording
									
									
									
							

								Yes, NTSC/PAL
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Resolution
									
									
									
							

								3840 x 2160p: 30 fps, 24 fps1920 x 1080p: 120 fps, 60 fps, 30 fps, 24 fps1920 x 1080i: 60 fps3840 x 2160p: 25 fps1920 x 1080p: 100 fps, 50 fps, 25 fps1920 x 1080i: 50 fps1920 x 1080p: 960 fps, 480 fps, 240 fps1920 x 1080p: 1000 fps, 500 fps, 250 fps
	                                
	                                
	                                
							







Video




								Video Clip Length
									
									
									
							

								Up to 4 GB or 29 Minutes
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Audio Recording
									
									
									
							

								Built-In Mic: With Video (Stereo)Optional External Mic: With Video
	                                
	                                
	                                
							







Viewfinder/Display




								Viewfinder Type
									
									
									
							

								Electronic
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Diopter Adjustment
									
									
									
							

								-4 to +3 m
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Viewfinder Coverage
									
									
									
							

								100%
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Screen
									
									
									
							

								3.0" LCD Rear Screen Tilt (1,228,800 pixels)
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Screen Coverage
									
									
									
							

								100%
	                                
	                                
	                                
							







Connectivity/System Requirements




								Connectivity
									
									
									
							

								1/8" Headphone, 1/8" Microphone, HDMI D (Micro), Micro-USB, USB 2.0
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Wi-Fi
									
									
									
							

								Yes, 802.11b/g/n built-in








Environmental




								Operating/Storage Temperature
									
									
									
							

Operating32 to 104°F (0 to 40°C)
	                                
	                                
	                                
							







Power




								Battery
									
									
									
							

								1 x NP-FW50 Rechargeable Lithium-Ion Battery Pack, 7.2 VDC, 1020 mAh
	                                
	                                
	                                
							







Physical




								Dimensions (WxHxD)
									
									
									
							

								5.2 x 3.7 x 5.0" / 132.5 x 94.0 x 127.4 mm
	                                
	                                
	                                
							



								Weight
									
									
									
							

								2.4090 lb / 1095 g with battery and memory card








Packaging Infotwubucbfzxfu




				Package Weight
			

				3.75 lb
			



				Box Dimensions (LxWxH)
			

				8.4 x 6.3 x 6.1"
			














Sony DSC-RX10 III reviews


Be the first to review this item

Write a review



Customer Photos


 














































































Sony DSC-RX10 III Q&A

















































				See any errors on this page?
				
					Let us know.
				





Close
Close
Close


    	Please enable javascript for your best B&H experience.
    













Loading 

















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft






















Loading Your Search Results - PeopleLooker.com























Updating Data On {{nameize fn}}{{#if mi}} {{nameize mi}}{{/if}} {{nameize ln}} {{#validLocation city}}in {{city}}{{#validLocation state}},{{/validLocation}} {{/validLocation}}{{#validLocation state}}{{#unless city}}in {{/unless}}{{uppercase state}}{{/validLocation}}
Important! PeopleLooker uses real public records. The information may be surprising.












Less than 30 seconds remaining


Continue to Results 







Now
We look up all people named {{nameize fn}} {{nameize ln}}.




Next
You pick which one you're looking for.




Then
We search our database for info on them.




Hooray!
You get your report!












Where does {{nameize fn}}{{#if mi}} {{uppercase mi}}{{/if}} {{nameize ln}}
live?
Please help us narrow down your search











All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





I'm not sure














Please enter a full name
Please help us narrow down your search







First Name:

Please Enter First Name


Last Name:

Please Enter Last Name












































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.





































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.





































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.





































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.

























f b&o | eBay




Please enable JavaScript 
Our new search experience requires JavaScript to be enabled. Please enable JavaScript on your browser, then try again.





 Skip to main contenteBayShop by categoryShop by categoryEnter your search keywordAll CategoriesAntiquesArtBabyBooksBusiness & IndustrialCameras & PhotoCell Phones & AccessoriesClothing, Shoes & AccessoriesCoins & Paper MoneyCollectiblesComputers/Tablets & NetworkingConsumer ElectronicsCraftsDolls & BearsDVDs & MovieseBay MotorsEntertainment MemorabiliaGift Cards & CouponsHealth & BeautyHome & GardenJewelry & WatchesMusicMusical Instruments & GearPet SuppliesPottery & GlassReal EstateSpecialty ServicesSporting GoodsSports Mem, Cards & Fan ShopStampsTickets & ExperiencesToys & HobbiesTravelVideo Games & ConsolesEverything ElseAdvancedHi (Sign in to bid or buy) Daily Deals Gift Cards Help & Contact Sell My eBayExpand My eBay Summary Bids/Offers Watch list Wish list All lists Purchase history Selling My Collections Followed searches MessagesNotification  {"url":"http://ir.ebaystatic.com/cr/v/c1/thirtysevens.jpg","maxViews":4,"imgSize":37,"expiry":300000,"timeout":250} 
Refine your search for f b&o














Refine


moreFormatFormat


All Listings - Current page

Auction
Buy It Now
Classified ads




Sort: Best Match

Best Match



Time: ending soonest
Time: newly listed
Price + Shipping: lowest first
Price + Shipping: highest first
Distance: nearest first



View: LIST






Gallery view 
Customize... 






747
results for f b&o

Follow f b&o to get e-mail alerts and updates on your eBay Feed.
Unfollow f b&o to stop getting updates on your eBay Feed.
Yay! You're now following f b&o in your eBay Feed.You will receive email alerts for new listings. Don't send me e-mail alerts.




	   Follow this search









  f b&o: 
 












Items in search results











B&O 4563  F7A  loco   Baltimore & OhiRailroad ORIGINAL 35MM Slide



$1.99


1 bid

















h o trains: BALTIMORE & OHIO F7-dummy B unit--ready to roll



$5.99


0 bids




















Original ER - B&O EMD w/F7 - Number - 5964-4630 - ral5284



$3.95


0 bids




Free shipping




















B&O  4619  F7A  loco Baltimore & Ohio  Railroad duplicate  35MM Slide



$1.99


1 bid

















LIONEL 81004  B&O DEPREESED CENTER F/C W/TRANSFORMER




					$33.50



				or Best Offer




Free shipping














B.O.F. - Musiques de Film de Legende [New CD] France - Import




					$8.95

									List price: Previous Price
$9.98




				Buy It Now




Free shipping






See more like thisB.O.F. - Musiques de Film de Legende [New CD] France - Import















Lionel B&O/Baltimore & Ohio 8363 F-3 A-Unit Shell ONLY




					$14.99



				Buy It Now






See more like thisLionel B&O/Baltimore & Ohio 8363 F-3 A-Unit Shell ONLY










Bang & Olufsen B&O PLAY H8 Brown Leather Wireless Headphones On-Ear (5-6F)




					$249.99



				Buy It Now


















Scott #1006 $0.03 B & O Railroad Sheet ( F. V. - $1.50 ) Missing Some Selvage




					$2.95



				Buy It Now
















BALTIMORE & OHIO B&O F7A #4557 at Willard, Ohio 10/73 ORIG KODACHROME CX0005



$8.50


0 bids




Free shipping

























F&S Beer Can, Fuhrmann & Schmidt Brewing Corp. Shamokin, PA GOOD Condition B/O



$1.99


1 bid

















Barbra Streisand - Yentl (B.O.F.) [New CD] UK - Import




					$7.76

									List price: Previous Price
$9.98




				Buy It Now




Free shipping





















1890's B & O S-W Railroad Luggage Label Poster Stamp F93




					$95.00



				or Best Offer


















ATHEARN HO SCALE F7 A UNIT DIESEL ENGINE BALTIMORE AND OHIO B&O POWERED





					$15.99



				Buy It Now


















B&O PLAY H3 HSS-F800 (by Bang & Olufsen) In-Ear Headphone with Microphone (LG Fr




					$89.99



				Buy It Now




Free shipping






See more like thisB&O PLAY H3 HSS-F800 (by Bang & Olufsen) In-Ear Headphone with Microphone (LG Fr







FAST 'N FREE
Get it on or before Thu, Jul. 27















Lionel B&O/Baltimore & Ohio 8364 F-3 A-Unit Shell ONLY CLEAN




					$24.99



				Buy It Now
















Original Slide B&O  Baltimore & Ohio F7B 5537 In 1968



$4.00


0 bids

















Lionel B&O Baltimore And Ohio F3 B unit Dummy 8468



$60.00


0 bids




					$80.00



				Buy It Now





















Original Slide of B&O F-7A Cumberland, MD  1969



$20.00


0 bids




Free shipping

















NEW LIONEL B & O F3 SHELL



$34.50


0 bids




















B.O.C. F12622 Women US 9 Gray Ankle Boot Pre Owned  1775


		Save 30 - 75%, Lowest Prices - Top Brands - ApparelSave



					$11.99

									List price: Previous Price
$85.00




				Buy It Now


















ATHEARN? LIFE LIKE? HO BALTIMORE & OHIO B&O DIESEL POWERED F7A DIESEL USED



$19.95


0 bids

















LIONEL   -  O SCALE   -    F3 NON-POWERED B UNIT    #  8468   B&O




					$69.99



				Buy It Now
















SPONSORED
B.O.D.Y.  VOL.1-15 Comics Complete Set Japan Comic F/S




					$64.81



				Buy It Now




Free shipping







					From Japan







SPONSORED
B & O Play BeoPlay H8 Headphones Deep Red [Domestic Genuine] from japan New F/S









1 product rating




					$553.99
Trending at
$615.01





				Buy It Now




Free shipping







					From Japan







Lionel B&O Baltimore And Ohio F3 8363 Power in original box



$100.00


0 bids




					$165.00



				Buy It Now

















Stewart Hobbies B&O EMD F7A ph.1 late. Blue & Gray scheme. Kato Drive




					$49.95



				or Best Offer













Scott #1006 $0.03 B & O Railroad Sheet ( F. V. - $1.50 )




					$5.95



				Buy It Now













B.O.B.BOB f/ BRUNO MARS PARAMORE Nothin on You / Airplanes VINYL [Single] NEW




					$7.99



				Buy It Now




					4 watching










b.o.c. Born Concept Cassie Boot, Coffee F/G, Size 8.5 NzwK




					$50.74

									List price: Previous Price
$175.00




				Buy It Now




Free shipping













NEW LIONEL B & O F3 SHELL



$34.50


0 bids

















Lionel Trains B&O Baltimore & Ohio F-3 A-B-A F-3 Custom Painted Loco Shells




					$69.99



				Buy It Now





















DUPLICATE SLIDE - Baltimore & Ohio B&O 280 F-7 Action on Freight Cumberland MD



$4.89


1 bid




Free shipping

















Funaro F&C HO B&O M15 L/M  Wagontop Automobile Boxcar 7020




					$32.50



				Buy It Now
















Original Slide B&O Baltimore & Ohio Old Paint F7A 4487 In 1974



$7.50


1 bid

















ATHEARN 3219 & 3220 HO BALTIMORE & OHIO B&O DIESEL POWERED F7A LOCOMOTIVE PWR




					$99.99



				Buy It Now


















Vintage Athearn HO 3019 Baltimore & Ohio F7A Diesel Dummy Appears unused in O/B




					$15.00



				Buy It Now













LUSH Long fitted black top Sm -with pretty draped ruffle down each side F&B o-04




					$12.00



				or Best Offer




Free shipping













SPONSORED
B&O Play BeoPlay H5 wireless Bluetooth black BeoPlay H5 Black japan NEW F/S




					$299.00



				Buy It Now




Free shipping




					2 watching




					From Japan







SPONSORED
BOB B.O.B. ATL Adventures of Sky 8" X 8" F Small POSTER




					$4.95



				Buy It Now
















DUPLICATE SLIDE - Baltimore & Ohio B&O 4597 F-7 Action on Freight



$4.89


1 bid




Free shipping

















Lot 7-248 Athearn F7A Super PWR B&O 3219 * Not Working w/ Box



$10.00


0 bids

















HO Scale Stewart Kato B&O Baltimore Ohio F3A F3B A/B Diesel Set Powered & Dummy




					$79.95



				Buy It Now


















New listing
		Lot of 3 used Athearn HO Scale engine shells B&O C&O GP7 F7B




					$9.00



				Buy It Now













PROTOTYPE MODELER 7-8/89 B&O, PROPANE GAS SIDING, C&NW ALCO C-425, AMTRAK SDP40F




					$6.25



				Buy It Now













Athearn HO " B&O  F7A Super Power Diesel " new old stock lot # 11208




					$39.95



				Buy It Now













Washington B & O Is The Way To Go Vintage Poster Stamp Fabulous! F94




					$14.50



				or Best Offer





















Original Slide Spencer Streamliners: B&O/C&NW/Pan AM/SOU F units




					$4.99



				Buy It Now
















Baltimore & Ohio B&O Railroad RR F3A #4472 Negative Cottage Grove IN 1968




					$7.99



				Buy It Now




Free shipping


















Funaro F&C HO B&O M-53 Wagontop Boxcar  6930




					$33.50



				Buy It Now













New listing
		Bachmann Plus HO Scale 31211 EMD F7A Baltimore and Ohio B&O 321



$20.00


0 bids

















VINTAGE O SCALE K-LINE F SERIES B & O DIESEL ENGINE A & B -UNITS NEW IN BOX




					$375.00



				Buy It Now




Free shipping













2368 B&O LIONEL POSTWAR ? MODERN ? REMAKE ? F-3 ENGINE SHELL NOS NEVER USED



$49.99


0 bids




Free shipping

















Athearn B & O Railroad Custom Paint F-7 A-B  Freight runs nice!




					$109.99



				or Best Offer




Free shipping













SPONSORED
Bel-Art F16969-0012 Poxygrid B.O.D. Bottle Rack, 12 Places, 13?/?? x 9? x 7? in.




					$127.96



				Buy It Now




Free shipping






See more like thisBel-Art F16969-0012 Poxygrid B.O.D. Bottle Rack, 12 Places, 13?/?? x 9? x 7? in.










SPONSORED
bel-art f16968-0000 b.o.d. bottle carrier; 300ml, 8 places, 13? x 6¾ x 2? in.,




					$93.65



				Buy It Now




Free shipping






See more like thisbel-art f16968-0000 b.o.d. bottle carrier; 300ml, 8 places, 13? x 6¾ x 2? in.,













Tell us what you think




Pagination for search results




1
2
3
4
5








Items per page: 

50



25 
100 
200 









eBay determines this price through a machine learned model of the product's sale prices within the last 90 days.
eBay determines trending price through a machine learned model of the product’s sale prices within the last 90 days. "New" refers to a brand-new, unused, unopened, undamaged item, and "Used" refers to an item that has been used previously.
Top Rated PlusSellers with highest buyer ratingsReturns, money backShips in a business day with trackingLearn More
Top Rated PlusSellers with highest buyer ratingsReturns, money backShips in a business day with trackingLearn More















Search refinements





Categories

All

Toys & Hobbies
(292)




HO Scale Model Railroad Locomotives
(90)


Other HO Scale Model Railroads & Trains
(43)


HO Scale Model Railroad Freight Cars
(33)


O Scale Model Railroad Locomotives
(33)


N Scale Model Railroad Locomotives
(19)




Model Railroads & Trains
(274)


HO Scale Model Railroads & Trains
(178)


Other O Scale Model Railroads & Trains
(8)


More




Stamps
(88)




Canadian Back of Book Stamps
(66)




Other British Colony & Territory Stamps
(4)


US Stamp Sheets
(3)


US Stamp Plate Blocks
(3)


More




Collectibles
(61)




Collectible Railroad Slides
(16)


Collectible US Pull Tab Beer Cans
(5)


Collectible Motorcycle Patches
(5)


Collectible Railroad Magazines
(5)


Collectible Train & Railroad Postcards
(4)




Collectible Railroad Hardware
(3)


Collectible Railroad Photos
(3)


Vintage Non-Sport Trading Cards (Pre-1980)
(3)


More




eBay Motors
(52)




Car Speakers & Speaker Systems in Motors
(8)


Car & Truck Axle Parts
(7)


Other Car & Truck Parts
(6)


Car & Truck Parts
(36)


Car & Truck Interior Trim
(4)




Car Audio Amplifiers in Motors
(3)


Car & Truck Emission Modules & Control Units
(3)


Other Car & Truck Interior Parts
(3)


More




Clothing, Shoes & Accessories
(50)







Home & Garden
(44)


Music
(34)


Consumer Electronics
(33)


Sporting Goods
(25)


Business & Industrial
(18)


Books
(14)


Computers/Tablets & Networking
(13)


Cell Phones & Accessories
(7)


Musical Instruments & Gear
(6)


Entertainment Memorabilia
(4)


Cameras & Photo
(4)


Video Games & Consoles
(2)


Baby
(1)


DVDs & Movies
(1)


Specialty Services
(1)


Coins & Paper Money
(1)


Show more







Condition
see allCondition




New
(404)





Used
(233)





Not Specified
(110)





Price



Please enter a minimum and/or maximum price before continuing.
			$ Enter minimum price to $ Enter maximum price 





Format
see allFormat




All Listings(filter applied)
(747)




Auction
(56)




Buy It Now
(698)




Item Location
see allItem Location




Default(filter applied)





Within


Within
2 miles5 miles10 miles15 miles25 miles50 miles75 miles100 miles150 miles200 miles500 miles750 miles1000 miles1500 miles2000 miles of Enter your ZIP code 
						Go

Please enter a valid zipcode





US Only





North America





Worldwide






see allSellerSeller





Delivery Options
see allDelivery Options




Free shipping





Free In-store pickup





Show only
see allShow only




Returns accepted





Completed listings





Sold listings





Deals & Savings





More refinements...































*Learn about pricing




		 This page was last updated:  Jul-21 21:23. Number of bids and bid amounts may be slightly out of date. See each listing for international shipping options and costs.




















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search





  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip






















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



 Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search





  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip






















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search






  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results

Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip


What's Your Age?


Submit
I don't know

Skip























Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search





  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip






















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search





  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip
















